

  p. 1753 (#685)                      #

PROFESSIONAL NOTES
PREPARED BY
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. W. UNDERWOOD, U. S. Navy
FROM JULY 7 TO AUGUST.7
1753
1754
1756
1758
GENERAL ARRANGEMENT
GREAT BRITAIN
Future Capital Ships..................
Unemployment ......
An Airship Offensive......
The Air Ministry's Exhibits at Wembley..
FRANCE
Impressions of French Sea Power........
French Navy Notes..........
UNITED STATES
“Old Ironsides" Campaign........
Hawaii's Naval Needs.....
1762
1764
....................................
1704
1766
1767
AVIATION
Commercial Air Transport......
Civil and Military Aircraft......
The Uses of Water Recovery....
1768
1769
1769
...
1773
1773
1775
1775
.......
177
1776
1780
ENGINEERING
The Motor Passenger Liner “Asturias”.........
Supercharging ......
Proposed German Admiralty Rotorships...
Motorship Performances (“Aorangi”)..
German Diesel Engine Practice........
ORDNANCE
Gunnery in the Battle of Jutland.
MERCHANT MARINE
World's Shipbuilding Touches Lowest Level Since War.....
The World's Merchant Shipping ......
Merchant Ship Subsidy Systems ........
Ford's Bid for Scrap Ships...........
Scrapping Shipping Board Ships......
MISCELLANEOUS
Submarine Cruisers .....
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
1782
1785
1787
1790
1791
..................
1701
1792
1798


  p. 1754 (#686)                      #

1754
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
GREAT BRITAIN
Future Capital Ships
The Army, Navy and Air Force Gazette, 4 July, 1925.-Will the Nelson
and Rodney, which are shortly to take the water on the Tyne and the
Mersey, prove to be the last battleships of large displacement to be built
for any power? It is rash to speculate on such a matter, but the indica-
tions at present certainly point in this direction. It is well to recall the
circumstances under which these vessels were put in hand. The Washington
Conference of 1921-22 proposed a complete ten-year naval holiday from
battleship construction, but Japan stood out for the completion of her new
battleship Mutsu, which gave her two post-Jutland ships of the latest
design. America then insisted on completing two more, the Colorado and
West Virginia, and, to maintain the status quo, Great Britain, which had
stopped work on four new battleships at the start of the conference, was
authorized to build two others. Now, although the Washington Treaty
is to last until the end of 1936, or for another eleven and a half years, the
powers are not bound by it to suspend battleship construction for so long.
France and Italy have the right to resume such construction in 1927, and
to lay down in that year ships which will come into service in 1930-31 to
replace the Jean Bart and Dante Alighieri, respectively. Much will doubtless
depend upon whether they exercise this right.
Three years ago, the right to build a new battleship was offered to the
French Government by the loss of their ship, the France. They took no
advantage of the clause in the treaty which permits of the replacement of
capital ships or aircraft-carriers accidentally destroyed, and the precedent
may commend itself in 1927. After all, each power is only authorized to
lay down one ship in that year and the use of such an isolated unit would
raise some awkward problems. Much better, it would seem, would be the
construction instead of, say, three 10.000-ton cruisers, or six flotilla leaders
similar to the fine trio of Italian ships now visiting the Baltic. Supposing
France and Italy take this view, their action will not be without its in-
fluence on the other signatory powers, Britain, America, and Japan, as to
the decisions they will make in 1931, when they are allowed to resume
battleship construction. Another conference before that date might well
confirm and consolidate what would by then have become the general ten-
dency.
It is only a question of agreement between the powers before what we now
call the cruiser becomes the capital ship of the future. As Admiral Sir
William Henderson has often argued, a 10,000-ton cruiser could perform
all the functions of a battleship, provided that the nations had agreed that
vessels of larger tonnage should not be built. From the standpoints of
personnel and operations, there can be no question that two or three cruisers
would be preferable to one battleship. As regards the strategic aspect, too,
Admiral Henderson has pointed out that fleets should be constituted to fit
the probable theaters in which they may have to act. This points to the
elimination of the big ship, and the use of smaller, simpler, and more
mobile vessels. The naval lesson of the war, he affirms, is that the con-
struction and organization of the fleets was such that they could only be
used to advantage in narrow waters. But, the next move is with the
politicians if a return to smaller dimensions is to be brought about, for the
powers must agree collectively before any one of them dares take the risk
which failure to include the largest and most powerful vessels in their battle
squadron would involve.


  p. 1755 (#687)                      #

1925]
1755
Professional Notes
Unemployment
The Engineer, 3 July, 1925.—So much has already been said about unem-
ployment, so many people have studied it profoundly and so many cures or
palliatives have been examined or tested that it may seem scarcely worth
while to discuss it again. Yet, the debate in the House of Commons on
Monday last invites our consideration if only on account of the honest and
admirable speech which was delivered by the Prime Minister. Mr. Baldwin
does not suffer from the illusion that unemployment can be stopped by
Parliament, and he made an effort, which his opponents sought to defeat,
to raise the whole subject out of the political cockpit. Whatever politicians
may think of a Prime Minister who hesitates to make claims which he knows
he will find difficulty in maintaining; who refuses to take advantage of the
speeches and failures of his predecessors in office, and who seeks to elevate
a wrangle into a debate, all who are intimate with the industries of the
country can appreciate the necessity of a clear statement of facts free from
political bias and from vague promises of performances which history has
shown over and over again that Parliament is unable to effect. Unemploy-
ment is no new thing. Ever since the industrial era began there have been
recurrent periods of bad trade, and we are not aware that in a single in-
stance the action of any government in the world has retarded their arrival
or hastened their departure. All that Parliament can do, apart from the
execution of relief works, is to facilitate trading conditions. It cannot
produce a demand that does not exist, and, as we have seen in the case of
housing, it is powerless to increase output in the face of the opposition of
an industry.
There are two aspects from which the depressed position of the trade of
the country may be regarded. One is that it is not our own fault and the
other that it is. It is impossible at the present day to say quite definitely
which point of view should be taken. In the familiar ten-year trade cycles
it was fairly safe to assert that the country was no more responsible for the
hollows in the waves than it was for the crests. Influences beyond the con-
trol of any single country were at work to make or mar us. Even the
heavens conspired for our advantage or distress. A bad harvest, a bad cot-
ton crop, a disastrous wool clip brought the purchasing power of the world
down and trade suffered a set-back. On the other hand, fine weather fol-
lowed by plentiful harvests of all kinds filled the pockets of purchasers and
trade abounded. In how far the conditions of the present slump resemble
those of normal trade cycles we cannot say, but this much at least we have
reason to believe, that this country is not an isolated sufferer and that the
trade of other European countries is not as rosy as it is sometimes made
to appear. It is at least possible that we are in the trough of an ordinary
depression to which there is added a secondary depression of about equal
magnitude peculiar to certain industries of this country. If this is the
case we may expect, in the course of a year or two, recovery from part
of our complaint-from that part which we call the normal cyclical de-
pression. Shall we recover from the remaining portion? We speak now
only of the industries with which we are concerned, the industries which
for the most part are those suffering most severely at the present time.
Mr. Baldwin spoke in admirable terms of the necessity of allying science
with manufactures. Of the importance of that alliance it is impossible
to speak too highly. It is an absolute essential to progress; in its absence
we cannot hope to compete with other countries; but we must not fall
into the easy mistake of supposing that such an alliance is all that is
needed. Science is the beginning of industry, not its continuance. The
industry must be carried on by the factory and its organization, and we


  p. 1756 (#688)                      #

1756
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
believe that it is just there that the weakness of this old manufacturing
country will be found. We have, it is true, many fine new works and ship-
yards; but we have also a great many that are antiquated, and we are con-
tinually handicapped by the effort to combine modern scientific processes and
methods with works which were built for the methods of half a century
and more ago. We have, particularly during the past few years, seen
examples of capital expenditure on a magnificent scale, but on the whole it
must be admitted that British manufacturers have been more chary about
the modernization of works than America or Germany. As a matter of
fact, for a long period we found it profitable to adhere to the old plants.
Labor was relatively cheap, our markets were established, and we could
carry on very well against such opposition as we had to meet. But, a
great change has taken place. Not only have we to meet much greater
competition from countries outside the empire which have hastened to in-
crease their engineering production, but we are confronted with the fact
that in several lands within the empire engineering is advancing so rapidly
that the old dependence on the mother country is disappearing. Searched
to its foundation, the problem resolves itself into this: Can we hope,
with the prospect of foreign trade steadily diminishing, to support a popu-
lation of forty-five millions in greater comfort than a smaller population
enjoyed ten years ago? We fear that there is but one answer to it.
Something, indeed, might be done by the rejuvenation of old works and
the general improvement of industries, but unless we can get more foreign
trade than we had before the war-an unlikely consummation—the prob-
ability is that we shall find it impossible to support so large a population as
at present. Economists tell us that with the coming of the industrial era
in Great Britain the population rapidly increased because means of support
were easy to find. We may assume that, by the converse process, it will
decrease automatically when means of support diminishes.
There is, we admit, no helpful policy in that philosophic point of view.
It takes us nowhere. Is there nothing that can be done now? nothing
that will delay the decrease of our population? We agree with Mr.
Baldwin that the government can do but little and that industries must
help themselves, yet as we believe one of the first steps to be the modern-
ization of antiquated factories, we were glad to observe his statement that
the government was prepared to give facilities for the "modernizing and
repairing of plant in works." There are many, many works in the kingdom
that would do well to take advantage of that offer. But, as we have sug-
gested, the improvement of factories only takes us part of our road. The
rest of it lies by a harder path. With all of our factories set in order,
with science firmly allied to industry, we might support our present popu-
lation in the standard of comfort which it enjoyed in pre-war days. It
is doubtful whether, in the face of decreasing foreign demand for our
goods and increasing foreign competition, we can hope to maintain a popu-
lation of forty-five millions at the standard of life which is now demanded.
Foreign trade now, as always, is the key to the situation. We may tempt
it back by lowering our costs of production, which, in the long run, means
lowering the standard of living; or, alternatively, if we insist on maintain-
ing the present standard of living, we must be content with a smaller
volume of foreign trade and a smaller population. Whither that policy
would ultimately lead us we do not propose to discuss.
An Airship Offensive
By Admiral Sir W. H. Henderson, The Evening Post, 10 July, 1925.—
The minister for air, Sir Samuel Hoare, at Pulham the other day, made


  p. 1757 (#689)                      #

1925)
1757
Professional Notes
statements in regard to the value of airships which require serious examina-
tion if the public is not to be misled and vast sums of money spent before
it is too late. The criticism of airship policy which Sir Samuel Hoare
derides is something more than that of "timid people who dislike great
experiments that may lead to big changes in established ideas."
It is based rather on principles of which the air minister appears to be
completely unaware, principles which a sailor, from his training, can
appreciate. A word of explanation and of protest from an old seaman
may not, therefore, be out of place.
The escape of R-33 was simply due to the fact that the gale abated
in time to enable her, with the amount of petrol she luckily had on board,
combined with pluck and good management, to crawl home before all of
her petrol was expended. Had the gale lasted but a very little longer
she would, in all probability, have been lost.
To a landsman or a sailor the movements of the air are felt as, and
designated as, wind; they interfere but little with transport either on
land or at sea, for in case of necessity natural shelter is almost always
available; a well found ship can always hold her own in open water.
This is not so with aircraft, and is, therefore, the underlying fallacy
concerning lighter-than-air (that is, airship) schemes. An airship afloat,
immersed in the air, is in a current which carries her with it whatever its
direction. She does not feel any wind except that which may be caused
by her own propulsion through it. Only by being able to fix her position by
astronomical observation, by directionals, by bearings of objects on the
land (including, as suggested, enormously powerful lighthouses at frequent
intervals) can she be aware of the direction in which she is being taken;
and if these fail her, as they will do, especially when over the sea, she
can have no knowledge of her position and drift.
Sailors have to do with currents, but the currents of the oceans and seas
are practically constant, are well known, are charted, and are exceedingly
slight compared with those of the air, which may range up to 100 miles an
hour. Even in only fresh breezes they average from fifteen to twenty miles,
and always vary constantly both in direction and speed.
An airship cannot hope to hold her own unless she has a speed superior
to that of the current of air against which she may have to proceed.
The inability of R-33 to make any stand against a current of 45-55 knots
has again demonstrated the necessity of a higher speed, and 70 knots is
aimed at in the new government airships, necessitating craft of 5,000,000
cubic feet capacity.
These unwieldy monsters will require for shelter, in place of the an-
chorages nature provides for ships, huge artificial hangars (it was stated
that one to take the R-II would be large enough to contain both St.
Paul's Cathedral and the Nelson Monument), enormous mooring masts,
directional stations, lighthouses, factories, and armies of groundmen always
ready, scattered not only along, but outside of their routes. In fact, air-
ships need artificial provision in every single respect to enable them to work
at all.
I see it is proposed to make a beginning by the establishment of an
aerodrome at Colchester, which it was stated at a meeting of the town
council “would mean the expenditure of something like a half million
of money and that establishment in Colchester of about 500 men.” For
what purposes ? None that can ever pay commercially, for not only will the
cost of airships and their paraphernalia be prohibitive, but their available
weight-carrying capacity is exceedingly small, and when the weights
of the hull, envelope, engine, necessary ballast, fuel, crew, etc., are deducted
from the total lifting capacity, little remains over to afford any paying


  p. 1758 (#690)                      #

1758
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
proposition, even were safety and reliability not the essential disiderata.
One has to remember the disasters which happened to the eight Zeppelins
in October, 1917 to R-34 in 1921, and the French airship Dirmude, which,
in December, 1923, was carried away in a current and lost with the fifty-
three people who were on board her; and, in addition to the ever-present
danger of atmospheric currents, there is the risk of thunderstorms. In
“The Distribution of Thunderstorms Over the Globe" (Geophysical Memoirs
No. 24), Air Ministry Meteorological Office, Mr. C. E. P. Brooks, MSc.,
estimates that 44,000 occur daily throughout the world, mainly in the
tropics, the Java Sea being the worst region.
Lightning is very dangerous to airships should there be any escape of
hydrogen. Those who note these things will recall that the British airship
N.S.-II was struck by lightning off Norfolk in 1919, and fell into the
sea, a blazing wreck.
An airship disregards the first principles of transport, which are that a
ship or any other means of transport must have a power of motion of its
own, greatly in excess of the modicum in or on which it moves. She is
consequently only a fine-weather craft, capable of making trips in selected
weather, or for use for reconnaissance on selected days from some few
definite positions. That this is the case was shown over and over again
by the Zeppelins during the war.
The Air Ministry's Exhibits at Wembley
The Engineer, 17 July, 1925.-To those willing to seek out and study the
Air Ministry's exhibits at the British Empire Exhibition, a feast of great
scientific interest can safely be promised. We do not refer particularly
to the examples of full-sized airplanes shown in the Palace of Housing
and Transport, for neither the service nor the civil machines exhibited are
particularly modern, and are staged more for the education of the general
public than for the attention of technical people. Nor do we reier es-
pecially to the series of airplane models shown in the British Government
Pavilion. Individually, these models are very beautiful examples of mini-
ature mechanical construction, and collectively they present a striking syn-
opsis of the evolution of aircraft from the early Roe triplane and the
strangely grotesque Cody machine to such fairly recent productions as the
10,000-horsepower Avro, Aldershot and the triple-engined Handley Page,
Hamilton. But, here again the interest is popular rather than technical.
Opposite these models is to be found, among other similar exhibits, a
tableau, arresting alike in its artistic realism and in its effect on the blood,
illustrating the slaughter of the retreating Turks by British and Australian
bombers in a gorge of the Wady-Fara, on September 21, 1918. It is
an almost over-grim demonstration of the efficacy of aerial forces against
troops on the ground when too panic-stricken to defend themselves, and
it is with a feeling approaching relief that we turn to an examination of
the more peaceful uses of aircraft and of the instruments and devices as-
sociated with their design and operation.
It has been argued, even by some intimately associated with the develop-
ment of aircraft, that the “conquest" of the air has not benefited humanity.
On balance, we have no doubt, airplanes and airships have so far produced
more of evil than of good. The benefits obtainable from civil aerial trans-
port-to some they still even require demonstration-are not so great as
to compensate for the suffering and destruction which military aircraft
have caused, and will undoubtedly continue to cause, in warfare. Aero-
nautics, however, almost from the first, was given a military trend and,
possibly to its own misfortune, was at a critical stage in its development


  p. 1759 (#691)                      #

1925)
1759
Professional Notes
when circumstances arose which compelled attention to be exclusively de-
voted to its application to war purposes. While the military side of aviation
will probably always be the dominant one, it is not to be supposed that
the transport of passengers and goods represents the only important appli-
cation on the civil side. Rapid and important developments, as a section
of the Air Ministry's exhibit shows, are now proceeding in a field of applica-
tion, and photographic surveying of large tracts of land, to which aircraft
are peculiarly and exclusively adapted.
It would seem a fairly simple matter to take a series of photographs from
the air of contiguous areas of land and to mount them side by side to
form a map of the whole. Actually, it is not easy. In fact, to derive any
really useful delineation of the land over a large surface in this way requires
a considerable amount of mathematical work as a basis. Two methods are
available. For rapid survey work not demanding a great degree of refine-
ment, one oblique photograph taken from the air may be made to serve
the whole area. This method has been extensively applied in Canada. Pro-
vided two datum points fixed on the land surface by ground surveyors
are included in the photograph, the oblique view can be plotted as an or-
dinary vertical map projection by ruling a series of convergent grid lines
on the photograph and transferring the intersections onto a map blank ruled
with a corresponding rectangular grid. A development of this process con-
sists of employing an instrument of the camera lucida type. In this
device the oblique photograph is obliquely projected in such a way that
the one obliquely cancels the other, thus permitting the rectangular map to
be traced directly on the plane of projection.
For work requiring an increased degree of accuracy, a mosaic of photo-
graphs taken perpendicularly from the air is built up to form a complete
map. This process has been applied in a noteworthy instance to the map-
ping of the Irawaddy Delta which, consisting more or less of inaccessible
forest and swamp, does not lend itself readily or at all to ordinary ground
surveying. Working with this method the pilot flies back and forth along
parallel courses over the area to be surveyed, taking successive photographs
of the ground with a camera pointing vertically downwards. The camera
may be controlled by hand, but in some cases it is now operated auto-
matically by means of mechanism which varies the interval between the
exposures to suit the speed of the airplane.
The speed with which an aerial survey can be completed is one of its most
valuable features. In Canada the oblique photographic method has enabled
the first proofs of the finished map to be prepared for a large area in six
months' time, or in a fraction of the period which a ground surveyor
would take merely to make his field observations. Again, the detail revealed
by the photographic survey is very much greater than the ground surveyor,
chained it may be to transport by a canoe, can hope to record without
much wearisome journeying. In Canada it has been found possible to dis-
tinguish between the different classes of trees, deciduous and otherwise,
standing on the ground surveyed from the air. In that country, too, the
aerial survey organization works in conjunction with the forest fire-fighting
services, notifying an outbreak and assisting in the transport of the fire-
fighters from their base to the seat of conflagration. It is of interest to
note that our own ordnance survey has now decided to use aerial surveying
as a means of revising the twenty-five-inches-to-the-mile ordnance maps of
this country.
Of all the devices connected with aerial surveying which are exhibited by
the Air Ministry at Wembley, chief scientific interest must be accorded to
the "camera plastica," a device developed by the combined Admiralty, War
Office, and Air Ministry Air Survey Committee, and made by Cooke,


  p. 1760 (#692)                      #

1760
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Troughton and Sims, Ltd., of York. This appliance makes use of the
anaglyph principle, whereby two slightly displaced views of an object, one
in red and the other in green, are given an appearance of relief when
viewed through a green and a red glass. In the camera plastica a pair of
such stereoscopic views is projected, one by red and the other by green light,
on to a horizontal plotting board, which may be raised or lowered through
known scaled distances. If the red and green lights are set to flicker
rapidly and alternately, the image cast on the plotting board flickers as a
whole in unison. At certain points on the image, however, no flickering
is seen. At these points the red and the green rays intersect in the plane
of the plotting board. By raising or lowering the plotting board a dif-
ferent series of points becomes steady. Each series of steady points is
plotted and represents a contour line of the land being surveyed. The height
from contour line to contour line is read off from the scale attached to the
plotting table. Few, we think, will fail to agree with us in our view that
the camera plastica is a very beautiful instrument of considerable practical
promise.
Close to the aerial surveying section the visitor will find a large and
entertaining collection of ancient books, engravings, and other objects illus-
trating man's attempts at and thoughts about artificial flight from the time
of Bladud-a legendary king of Britain who 3,000 year ago attempted to
fly with wings on his shoulders, and killed himself by falling on the Temple
of Apollo in Trinovantum, or St. Paul's Cathedral in London, as we would
now call it—to the time of Cayley, Henson, and the other pioneers of
modern aeronautics. This exhibit was collected by Mr. J. E. Hodgson, a
well-known authority on aeronautical history, and both for its extent and
the manner in which it is arranged, deserves our consideration and praise.
In another part of the Government Building close to the series of model
airplanes to which we have referred above, a miniature wind tunnel in-
vites more than passing notice, especially if the visitor is allowed, as we
were, to operate it for himself. A wing section is exposed in the air
current and is connected by nine tubes from its top surface and by a like
number from the bottom to a series of eighteen separate water manometers
mounted side by side. The distribution of pressure on the underside of
the wing and the much more important distribution of suction on the upper
side and the manner in which these distributions alter as the wing is tilted
from zero incidence. up to the stalling angle are rendered visible in a
highly enlightened manner.
Passing into the Palace of Housing and Transport the visitor should
note the full sized reproduction of the tower of Croydon, from which,
with the aid of wireless telephony, the position of airplanes crossing to or
from the Continent is determined and their alighting and departure are
controlled. If he is fortunate he will head an actual message coming in
from an actual machine in flight, reporting its passage over some familiar
landmark, and will see the operator recording its position on a cork-faced
map by means of a small flag bearing the civil registration letters of the
machine.
Another exhibit relating to the navigation of airplanes, to which attention
should be given, is the duplicate of one of the six aerial lighthouses which
have now been erected on the continental route between Croydon and
Lympne. This lighthouse, the joint product of Chance Brothers and the
Gas Accumulator Company, is designed to operate without attention of any
kind for periods of six months or more. It has a range of visibility of
about thirty-five miles, a distance which is sufficient to enable a pilot flying
by night to pick up the second light before losing the first, and so on
throughout all six. The lighting up of the burner is controlled by a "sun-


  p. 1761 (#693)                      #

1925)
1761
Professional Notes
valve" on top of the lens work, the sensitiveness of the valve being ad-
justable so as to bring it into action at any desired degree of darkness.
The valve, we understand, is not sensitive to heavy clouds but would, or
could be made to, operate under the darkness of a really heavy thunder-
storm, Rotation of the light is effected by the pressure of the dissolved
acetylene gas on its way to the burner, and is therefore stopped and
started by the action of the sun valve. The automatic control of the ap-
paratus is even carried so far that should the gas mantle be broken or burnt
out in service it will be automatically replaced by a new one.
Aeronautics has undoubtedly caused the medical profession to look at
humanity from many new angles, so much so that the "air doctor” may
now be regarded as something of a specialist. Apart from the effects
produced on the human constitution by high altitudes, rapid speeds, sudden
accelerations and decelerations and other matters cognate to actual flight,
the medical officer attached to an aeronautical unit has to study the re-
action of those under his charge to movement in three dimensions. Until
this aspect of aeronautics was studied on a scientific basis its importance was
perhaps not realized by many, even among those closely connected with
aeronautics. All of the movements which we make in ordinary life call
for two-dimensional control, and after we have passed the babyhood stage,
no conscious effort is required for the coordination of our movements in
two planes; but when, as in flight, three-dimensional control is required,
good coordination comes naturally to a few individuals, can be acquired by
practice by others, and is apparently beyond the attainment of many. Such
would seem to be the lesson to be derived from the records obtained with
the Reid time reaction apparatus for testing pilots. This apparatus consists
of an airplane cockpit equipped with the usual means of controlling the
flying organs. The controls, however, instead of operating ailerons, ele-
vators, or rudders are connected to various electric lights on the dash-
board. The operations of banking, gliding, spinning and so forth are
indicated by the appearance of colored lights. Recovery is shown by the
appearance of three white lights, which mark the fact that the "airplane"
is Aying normally in all three dimensions. A tape-recording machine and
a chronometer are fitted to give a permanent record of the time taken by
the "pilot" to recover the normal flying altitude after it has been disturbed.
Many curious interesting facts have already been accumulated by the use
of this apparatus. Motor drivers and others accustomed to the control
of machinery usually show a short time reaction when their hands alone
are tested, although few or none are equally good with both hands. Foot
controls may also be good when tested separately, but even among the
best and most experienced airplane pilots a preference is nearly always
shown for turning to one side rather than to the other. When, however,
a combined foot and hand control is required, the entry of the third di-
mension upsets most people, and six or seven or more seconds may be
required to effect the coordination as compared with the tenth to a half
second for a really first-class born pilot. Those who sometimes feel a
certain sense of shame when they start at a sudden noise, may take consola-
tion from the fact that even the said born pilot will frequently show a
quick jump in his control curve when a Klaxon horn beneath the Reid
apparatus is sounded without warning. The height of the jump in the
curve is not, however, regarded as being of great importance. What is
examined is the after effect on the pilot-or patient, as it might be better to
call him. Whereas an ordinary being may show a widely "hunting” curve
for some time after being startled, the good pilot, the man born to fly, re-
covers very quickly and commonly gives an even better curve after than
before the disturbance.


  p. 1762 (#694)                      #

1762
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Reid apparatus can be adjusted to represent anything from a light
scout which can only be flown in the normal attitude by the constant manipu-
lation of the controls to a heavy bombing machine which is inherently
stable. It is of great interest as a means of translating a man into a curve.
In its purely professional aspect its value lies in the fact that it enables
candidates for pilotship to be examined at the start of their career with
the object of determining whether there is any reasonable likelihood of their
becoming good pilots in a short time. It enables the hopeless case to be
eliminated at the outset without risking his life and those of others in an
actual machine. It reveals the deficiencies on which special attention should
be concentrated during the training of the embryo pilot, provides a means
of practicing with the object of improving a new or former pilot's per-
formance, and serves to indicate the particular type of machine which the
would-be pilot is best qualified by his natural aptitude to control.
FRANCE
Impressions of French Sea Power
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 3 August, 1925.—Scenes of ex-
traordinary enthusiasm were witnessed at Cherbourg last Thursday when
President Doumergue reviewed the French fleet. Huge crowds of people,
many of whom had come from towns and villages some considerable dis-
tance inland, thronged the narrow streets of the quaint old port. Everyone
wanted a trip in the little steamers that took sight-seers around the fleet,
but these were unable to accommodate more than a tithe of the host and
the majority had to content themselves with a distant view of the fighting
ships, sixty of which lay at anchor in the roads.
I was fortunate enough to secure a passage in one of the first steamers
that went out to the fleet. As we steamed down the harbor guns began to
thunder from the batteries on the heights, for the presidential train had
just arrived at Cherbourg and the Chief Executive of the Republic was being
saluted with 101 guns. With him was a distinguished party of ministers,
senators, deputies, and officials.
I have already described in a cable to The Sun the principal events of the
day, such as the President's trip in a submarine (which, however, did not
submerge), his run in a destroyer at full speed and his visit to the arsenal,
where he drove the first rivet in the big submarine Redoubtable, a vessel of
some 3,000 tons and by far the largest underwater craft which France so
far has laid down.
As for the fleet itself, it was rather less imposing than one had expected.
Six battleships were there, but of these only four possess any degree of
fighting value. The old Voltaire and Diderot, in spite of their five funnels
and piled-up turrets, are wholly obsolete, and probably are kept only for
training purposes. The same is true of the armored cruisers that still
serve in the northern division, although they were built twenty years ago.
The two most powerful battleships, Province and Lorraine, compare as
to armament with the United States' New York and Texas, albeit they
are smaller and less well protected. Extensive modernization has completely
altered the appearance of these ships. Each is now fitted with a colossal
tripod mast, while the forefunnel has been raised and the tophamper in-
creased. Also, their big guns of 13.4-in. caliber have been modified to permit
of higher elevation, from 18° to 23°, and can now range up to 23,000 meters.
This change appears to have been tacitly approved by the other signatory
powers out of regard for the numerical weakness of the French battle fleet.
The Jean Bart, an older dreadnaught, mounting 12-in. guns, also has been
metamorphosed by bringing the two first funnels into one casing and fitting


  p. 1763 (#695)                      #

1925]
1763
Professional Notes
a tripod mast. Her sister ship, Paris, was present, but did not go out for
maneuvers with the rest of the fleet.
There was nothing between these big armor clads and the destroyers,
for the few light cruisers which France now owns were absent on blockade
duty along the Riff coast, and none of the five new ships building is ready to
hoist the pennant. Even the twenty-two destroyers present all dated from
the war or pre-war period and included a series of boats which once flew
the German flag. These, incidentally, looked the most powerful and busi-
nesslike of the lot.
But, it was the submarines that formed the real Pièce de résistance of
the display. Of these there were twenty-four of diverse types, among them
being the sister boats, Requin and Souffler, which have just been completed
at Cherbourg arsenal. It was from the deck of the Souffler that President
Doumergue reviewed the fleet, and the fact that he did so may signify
the unbounded faith which Frenchmen have in the deadly powers of the
underwater arm. As is well known, these craft constitute more than half
of the 120 new naval units which France has built and authorized since
the treaty. The Requin class are large boats of 1,130 tons, carrying one
gun and sixteen torpedoes. In outline they resemble the later German
U-boats, although French experts indignantly repudiate any hint of in-
spiration from the designers of hated Bocheland.
France hopes in the not remote future to command a fleet of 100 sub-
marines, by means of which and the cooperation of fifty big destroyers and
swarms of aircraft she looks forward to dominating the Mediterranean.
Very possibly she will do it. In any case, those waters will be decidedly
unhealthy for a hostile dreadnaught when the new French mosquito fleet is
in being.
A dozen sloops and mine sweepers of no great military value rounded off
the Cherbourg armada. Taken as a whole, its fighting power was not
appreciably above that of a single battle squadron of the British or Ameri-
can Navies, although the French crowds who cheered with so much ferver
seemed blissfully ignorant of the fact.
But, the future sea power of the republic is not to be measured by this
somewhat nondescript array of ships. A few years hence their place will
have been taken by twice the number of new craft, all designed on the basis
of war experience. Meanwhile, the existing fleet is used as a school for
training the officers and men who will handle the fleet of tomorrow. It
puts in a great deal of time at sea practicing battle evolutions, carrying out
gunnery and torpedo exercises and maneuvering in all conditions of weather.
What impressed me most during this visit to Cherbourg was the change
which has taken place in the French naval personnel. Having known the
pre-war navy fairly well, the contrast between the human element of 1914
and that of 1925 is, to me, quite remarkable. The typical French sea officer
of pre-war days was a scientist first and a sailor afterward, but his suc-
cessor of today typifies the happy mean between the two.
Ignoring differences in uniform, these bronzed, smooth-faced men might
be mistaken anywhere for British or American naval officers. They are, as
an English critic put it, "as keen as mustard" on their jobs. Their hearts
are obviously in their profession, of which they are intensely proud, and
they trust, and are trusted by their men. Of course there are exceptions,
but the old type of dreamy officer, who was more interested in Voltaire
and transcendental mathematics than in the manual of seamanship, seems
to me well-nigh extinct.
As with the executives, so with the enlisted men. These, as always,
are drawn mainly from the hardy seafaring communtities of Normandy and
Brittany, but they have improved enormously in smartness and bearing. It
is true that there is a malcontent minority which furtively distributes Com-


  p. 1764 (#696)                      #

1764
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
munist literature through the mess decks and is able, now and again, to
stir up a mutinous spirit among the greener recruits; but I am told on high
authority that the discipline and morale of the enlisted personnel in the
mass are beyond criticism, and the fleeting impression I was able to obtain
bears out this statement. It would certainly be foolish to ignore or minimize
the French Navy as a factor in the present and future balance of world
power.
French Navy Notes
The Naval and Military Record, 15 July, 1925.—The Riff War is taking
a disquieting turn, not only for France but also for Great Britain, that is
the greatest Moslem Power and stands to lose the most if Abdel Krim has
his own way. France is paying a terrible price for not understanding
sooner that Spain was fighting against the pugnacious Riff mountaineers
the battle of Europe. Gross and much regretted was the blunder of Premier
Herriot, when thoughtlessly and for reasons of internal politics he refused
the Moroccan collaboration Primo de Riveira offered him: greater still
will be the mistake of England if she fails to see in time the warnings on the
wall. Colonial warfare is assuming new shape and portent, since Germany,
having lost her own colonies in the mad 1914 venture, decided that her
victors should likewise lose theirs. Abdel Krim's well equipped army in the
Riff is merely a wing of the great Sovietic forces that are attacking France
at home with success.
The 1925 shipbuilding program has just been voted by the Senate, after
an animated and interesting debate. It will mean a substantial addition
to the French naval list, although only 35,000,000 francs are to be spent this
year on the units to be laid down, which means that the main progress will
be made next year. The 10,000-ton cruiser will be, but for a few minor
ameliorations, similar to the Duquesne and Tourville (185 meters long, 19
wide, 6.30 meter draught, 130,000 h.p., 35 knots, eight guns of 8-in. in axial
twin turrets of special anti-gas design, eight anti-aerial quick-firers firing
bomb shells of wide explosive radius, four triple torpedo tubes copied from
English types, and two light scouting seaplanes to carry small bombs). They
will be fine ships, no doubt, but on paper, at least, inferior to the larger
10,000-ton Italian Trente and Trieste, these being longer, wider, and better
armed since they carry twelve anti-aerial guns of greater power and sixteen
torpedo tubes, and as the same time have more powerful engines. The
Washington Conference, that adopted the 10,000-ton limit, apparently forgot
to define what is previously a 10,000-ton cruiser. It is surmised that the
cleverly-designed Italian cruisers are very fine indeed. It is expected
that the adoption of quadruple turrets in future French ships will restore
to the French side superiority for the utilisation militaire du déplacement
by permitting an armament of ten guns-eight in two quadruple turrets,
two in single turrets on the sides, giving an end-on fire of six 8-in. weapons,
superior to anything yet designed
The three 2,650-ton flotilla leaders, of which two are already ordered at
Lorient, will be superior to the Chacal type in structural robustness, motor
power, and armament; they will carry cruiser calibers, probably the
latest improvement of the 5.5-in. type, which is logical, superiority of range
over ordinary destroyers being necessary in flotilla mother-ships. More-
over, the advent of numerous 35-knot cruisers, themselves redoubtable
destroyers of destroyers, calls for a substantial increase in the speed of
flotilla leaders. We are in for a tremendous competition of speed that
will entail a fast depreciation of existing flotillas.
The four torpilleurs d'escadre, on the point of being ordered, will mark
a slight progress on the eighteen units of similar type now in hand (Simoun-


  p. 1765 (#697)                      #

1925]
1765
Professional Notes
Alcyon series) of 1,455 to 1,500 tons normal displacement. The armament
of four 5.1-in. weapons is considered sufficient, excelling that of all British
and American destroyers in commission; robustness and speed are the
points requiring attention.
The seven submarines, already ordered in Cherbourg, Lorient, and Brest
arsenals, will be improved copies of the Requin, Souffler, and Marsouin, that
are undergoing trials and giving satisfaction. There is nothing experimental
in them, but tried systems of motors. Their speed is moderate, not exceed-
ing 16 knots on the surface, but the shape and robustness of the bows and
hulls and of the endurance of the motors enable the nominal rate of speed
to be maintained at sea. With their sixteen 22-in. torpedoes apiece, the
sixteen submersibles of that class already in hand will mean a valuable
reinforcement to the French underwater flotillas, especially as they have been
designed for ocean warfare and can keep the sea for over thirty days at a
stretch. Twenty-one further units of so-called premiere classe are projected
to be laid down from 1926 to 1929.
In addition, two submarine mine-layers are to be ordered of the improved
Chailley type. The paris Section Technique has carefully studied this
effective and relatively economical type of defensive craft; lengthy post-
war comparative experiments, still going on, have been conducted in the
Mediterranean and in the Channel with the six sousmarins mouilleurs de
mines in service: viz., the Callot, of 1,300 tons; Chailley, of 1,200 tons ;
René-Audry (ex-Boche), of 1,600 tons; Reveillé (ex-Boche), of 980 tons ;
and Astree and Amaranthe, of 550 tons (submerged), that carry from
thirty to sixty mines with four different systems of installation. The
Normand and Gironde firms have specialized in this class of craft. The
Callot minelayer (Schneider Diesels) and the submersible Lagrange have
just completed a prolonged endurance test in the Mediterranean. A re-
serve supply of efficient mines is being prepared. All-round progress has
been realized, and the French Navy, that commenced the war with rather
inferior torpedoes and mines (nine different systems!) has well regained the
ground lost.
A large mine-laying cruiser is to be laid down shortly at Lorient; she
is intended for ocean warfare, colonial defense, and to be a sort of mining
flotilla mother-ship. A 19-knot seaplane carrier has, besides, been ordered
for general use. Had such a ship been available at the present moment,
operations against the Riff rebels would have been greatly facilitated. At
the same time, it would have been more economical and far more speedy
to convert a liner into a seaplane carrier, in imitation of what Great Britain,
Italy, and Spain have done with success.
The question of naval dirigibles is anew on the carpet. Their partisans
are many in the service, especially since the cost of fast cruisers is growing
at a rapid rate. Colonel de Grenedan, the father of the late commander
of the ill-fated Dixmude, has submitted to the Commissions de la Marine a
strong plea in favor of a return to the dirigible program that has been
abandoned as a consequence of the loss, he says, est le croiseur par ex-
cellence des marines pauvaes; it costs to build ten times less than a
cruiser, consumes per mile eight times less fuel, has a speed at least twice
superior and three times greater radius of action, possesses a radius of vision
twenty times superior, and is 100 times less vulnerable, besides requiring a
crew thirty times less numerous, and requires three months only to be com-
pleted instead of thirty. “Few eggs is one basket,” such is the rational re-
tort that well-managed navies must give to the growing powers of de-
struction ; that operates in favor of dirigibles. The material and human loss
caused to France by the Dixmude disaster was twenty-seven times inferior
to that which the Suffren (12,750 tons) catastrophe entailed. These con-


  p. 1766 (#698)                      #

1766
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
vincing arguments instilled new life into the existing French dirigible
flotillas, that are awaking anew to aerial activity.
On the other hand, Senator Cheron, in the name of the Upper Commis-
sion de la Marine, raised three points: viz., Helium gas, necessary for
safety, is at a prohibitive price; even helium-filled dirigibles would be at
the mercy of fighting seaplanes, that are twice as speedy and very much less
vulnerable; and, thirdly, the English Navy, as the result of long experience
and many tests, has given over the gas-bag. Yet, German experts are busy
improving the Friedrichshafen dirigible plant; that, too, deserves attention.
Interesting points are to be noted in the recent naval debate in the
Senate. There was not a single hostile vote to the Navy, in contrast with
the Chamber that contains anti-navy Communists. The submarine program,
though comprising twenty-one units now in hand, and thirty-six more to
construct from 1925 to 1929, was judged to be totally insufficient by many
senators; and if new submarines were not added to the list it was solely for
the sake of not delaying the taking in hand of the ships voted by the
Chamber. Again, the creation was urged of a Central Technical Com-
mittee, comprising only practical men, naval and non-naval (no windbags),
and having for its rôle research and to find new weapons, more economi-
cal and effective, better ships, and better motors—a right course, since
progress and efficiency are synonymous, but impossible now as l'adieux
paperasserie (Admiral Darrieus) is more than ever submerging the whole
French naval service, routine work taking up the best time of those con-
structors who ought to be heart and soul absorbed by ship-designing. The
English, Italian, and American Navies are much better off in that vital
respect. French public opinion's ignorance of the sea and of its life-and-
death importance Senator Cheron eloquently deplored.
UNITED STATES
“Old Ironsides” Campaign
(Information Circular) Lieutenant John A. Lord, U. S. N., the naval
constructor who has been assigned the task of rebuilding the U. S. S. Con-
stitution, the famous fighting frigate, after a careful survey has reported to
Rear Admiral L. R. de Steiguer, commandant of the First Naval District,
that any attempt to dock the historic ship in her present condition might
result in her collapse and make her restoration impossible.
Most of the job of rebuilding "Old Ironsides” must be done while she
is afloat, for the moment that she rests on her keel and on bilge blocks in
drydock the vertical pressure on the center lines of the badly decayed
frigate will cause her docks to buckle and in all probability fall to pieces.
This was the fate of the old wooden frigate Richmond some years ago when
she was placed in drydock at the Norfolk Navy Yard. Her decks buckled
and her lines became so distorted that the Navy Department was forced
to condemn her.
While "Old Ironsides" is afloat the pressure is evenly distributed, and
the work of rebuilding above the water line will proceed without mishap.
Then, with an elaborate system of shoring her up, she can be placed in a
drydock to have her hull rebuilt.
Lieutenant Lord comes of a long line of Maine wooden-ship builders and
is the only expert that the Navy Department could muster to rebuild the
Constitution when the school children of the nation raise $500,000, the
amount necessary for her restoration. The Benevolent and Protective
Order of Elks, upon the invitation of the Secretary of the Navy, have made
plans to make contact with every school in the nation and collect the chil-
dren's pennies, dimes, and nickels during the week of October 19-24.


  p. 1767 (#699)                      #

1925)
1767
Professional Notes
Hawaii's Naval Need; Comments by British
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 20 July, 1925.—London, July 2.-
American press stories of the naval maneuvers off Hawaii were studied
with deep interest by European observers who are hoping that some more
authoritative version of the proceedings will in due course be made public.
Meanwhile, the newspaper reports, being more or less unanimous, are
accepted as giving a fairly accurate narrative of what took place. The
impression they convey is that the maneuvers were planned not so much with
the idea of working out definite problems of strategy as for the purpose of
exposing the military weakness of the Hawaiian Islands and so bringing
Congress and the country at large into the right mood for granting the
money necessary to make good the most obvious deficiencies.
If this was really the object in view it seems to have been achieved,
judging from statements made subsequently by members of Congress who
were present.
It is, however, matter for surprise that such a demonstration should have
been needed. The enormous importance of this insular group as the key
factor of American defense in the Pacific is self-evident. It would be
physically impossible for the United States to conduct any serious war
operations, either defensive or offensive, in that ocean unless there existed
in Hawaii an adequate and well-found fleet base.
At present, it seems, no such base does exist. Under ordinary tidal con-
ditions Pearl Harbor cannot be entered by battleships even at normal draft,
to say nothing of damaged ships which might be drawing forty feet or
more. Clearly, therefore, the first requirment is a deepening of the chan-
nel to at least forty-five feet. Until this has been done Pearl Harbor must
continue to rank as a second-class base of limited war value.
Next in importance is the provision of additional docks for dreadnaughts.
With only one dock available the plight of a fleet which had suffered heavy
damage in an engagement would be desperate. Battered ships would either
have to wait their turn for repairs or be towed 2.000 miles to the American
mainland. In either case the delay might have disastrous results.
Nor is it only for ships damaged in action that docks are required.
Unless a warship is periodically docked and cleaned she loses her speed,
and it should not be overlooked that the speed of a fleet is that of its
slowest unit. It was only because all of the ships were docked and refitted
at regular intervals that the British grand feet was able to maintain a
uniform standard of efficiency during the World War.
At the Singapore base, where it is most improbable that more than half
the British fleet will ever be stationed at one time, there is to be dry dock
accommodation for two dreadnaughts, and possibly a floating dock for a
third ship of this type. It will be seen, therefore, that the building of
additional battleship docks in Hawaii is a requirement of the most urgent
importance.
Naval onlookers here are less impressed by statements of Oahu's vulner-
ability to attack, simply because they do not believe the Hawaiian group
lies within the radius of heavy assault from any quarter.
In the recent maneuvers the "Blue" forces approximated to the strength
of the Japanese Navy (vide The Sun for April 28), which was assumed
to have crossed the Pacific with its full force of ten capital ships and used
them to cover a landing of 30,000 troops on Oahu, the entire American bat-
tle fleet being temporarily imprisoned in the Atlantic by the destruction of
the Panama locks.
That the whole scheme of the Hawaiian war game rested upon such
far-fetched hypotheses explains why its strategic significance is discounted in
naval circles. Leaving aside the extremely improbable event of the entire


  p. 1768 (#700)                      #

1768
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
battle fleet's being in the Atlantic at a time when relations with Japan were
clouded ever so faintly, let us briefly examine the logistics of the strategical
problem here postulated.
Japan's ten capital ships represent her total resources in this type, and
losses among them could not be replaced in time to be of war service.
That she would send this fleet as a unit to essay the conquest of a strongly
fortified enemy base 3,400 miles distant is incredible. The presence of
numerous auxiliary ships and at least a score of troop transports would re-
strict the speed of the fleet to 12 or 14 knots, so that the voyage would
occupy ten or twelve days.
When it was approaching Hawaii this unwieldy armada would be liable
to attack by aircraft and submarines, for the war game credited the defense
with ninety of the former and twenty of the latter. It would arrive at the
objective with much of its fuel burned and no prospect of obtaining fresh
supplies unless American stocks of oil and coal were captured intact.
The ten capital ships would first have to silence the shore defenses, which
include a number of long-range guns and heavy howitzers. If experience at
the Dardanelles and on the Flanders coast counts for aught, this initial
operation would be foredoomed to failure, having regard to the forces
available on each side.
If the Japanese battleships fired at long range, their shooting would be
mostly ineffective; if they engaged the forts at close range, they would
stand a good chance of being disabled or sunk. What the troop transports
would be doing all of this time we are left to conjecture, but it would be
strange if they did not suffer severely from air and submarine attacks.
However, if by some miracle these difficulties were overcome, the next
step would be to throw ashore 30,000 men on the northern coast of Oahu,
which is supposed not to be commanded by any of the batteries. As the
landing would have to be made in boats, nosing their way through channels
in the coral reef, no big guns or other weighty material could be brought
ashore. In the war game a skeleton force of 1,500 men contrived to land
between dark and dawn, but when 30,000 were involved the operation might
take days.
And what would the defenders be doing while this leisurely invasion was
proceeding? Despite the naval bombardment, it would certainly be feasible
to rush mobile guns to positions whence the boats and landing beaches
could be brought under fire, leaving a machine-gun barrage to account for
such isolated parties of the enemy as managed to scramble ashore. As a last
line of defense there would be the complete mobile army division which is
stationed at Schofield Barracks.
Such are a few of the practical hindrances to a successful invasion of
Hawaii by the Japanese. Without terming it absolutely impossible, it may
fairly be described as a thousand to one chance. Since the Japanese in pre-
vious wars have always shown a shrewd appreciation of the elements of
strategy, it is in the last degree unlikely that they would ever dream of
committing themselves to an enterprise of this foolhardy character.
AVIATION
Commercial Air Transport
Aviation, 13 July, 1925.—Now that the National Air Transport has
ordered ten Carrier Pigeons to start its New York-Chicago service, there
will be some figuring done as to just how much flying these planes could
do. As the N.A.T. does not plan to fly on Saturdays or Sundays, the
number of round trips per year may average about 250, making allowance
for holidays and trips cancelled on account of bad weather. The round
trip is about 1,500 mi, to which should be added 10 per cent for ferrying
and testing. This would give a total mileage for one year of 412,500 mi.


  p. 1769 (#701)                      #

1925)
1769
Professional Notes
Taking this route mileage and using 100 mi./hr. as an average speed we find
that the ten planes will be required to fly 4,000 hr. per year or 400 per
machine which means a total average use of a machine of 1.6 hr. per flying
day or a little over one hour for the calendar year. As the life of a
modern airplane can be considered to be 200,000 mi., the above estimating
would indicate that ten Carrier Pigeons would last five years-eliminating
crashes.
It will be recalled that Colonel Searles of the Daimler Hire and later
of the Imperial Airways claimed that no airplane could make money un-
less it flew eight or more hours a day. Furthermore, he actually proved
that airplanes can do that much flying every day.
When all the enthusiasm over air transport has calmed down and costs
and profits are the main objectives, then just two questions will be upper-
most in the minds of the directors of the N.A.T. How much traffic was
there? What mileage did we get from our equipment? After all is said
about the enterprising vision of pioneers in air transport, the net result
will probably center around these two factors. We have seen estimates
that called for a complete rebuilding of a service plane after every 500
flying hours, and after every 100 hr. for engines. These estimates also
did not include the crashes. On this basis each of the ten Carrier Pigeons
would have to be rebuilt once every year. It will be one of the most
interesting phases of the development to observe the departures from air
mail practice of a company headed by men with aircraft experience. Nearly
everyone has heard the statement made that if the air mail is inefficient
it is because it is limited by governmental restrictions, civil service, and, to
a minor degree, political considerations. Everyone will watch the planes
of the N.A.T. with this in mind.
Civil and Military Aircraft
Aviation, 6 July, 1925.-In spite of the many statements to the contrary
it can be shown that aircraft for government uses and those for civilian
purposes are basically different. Both as regards cost and structural
strength, the two are as wide apart as the poles. The military and naval
people think of cost as the last item in considering an airplane's value.
Sacrifices are made at every step of design, fabrication, and test to get
the required performance. Just the contrary is true with aircraft for
commercial purposes. Safety and earning power are the prime considera-
tions with these types. Costs must be reckoned with continually and no
compromises are allowable when life or property is to be transported.
With these fundamental differences in mind and an incentive provided in the
form of substantial rewards for advanced designs, the constructors would
not be so enamoured by the size of government orders that they would
consider commercial types of machines as a side line.
The Uses of Water Recovery
Aviation, 6 July, 1925.-Water recovery is now in use as regular equip-
ment on the airships Shenandoah and Los Angeles, and it has been con-
clusively demonstrated that an amount of water can be recovered from the
exhaust gases from the engines, in fight, which more than enuals the
weight of fuel consumed in porducing those exhaust gases. While this is
an interesting novelty, it may be wondered just what the value of the system
may be, and it is the purpose of this article to outline a few uses to which
it may be put.
The first is the conservation of lifting gas. In an airship it is necessary
to maintain an approximate balance between the lift exerted by the helium
or hydrogen in the gas cells and the weight, represented by structure, crew,
fuel, ballast, and so forth. If there is an excess of lift it may be corrected


  p. 1770 (#702)                      #

1770
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
by permitting some of the lifting gas to escape, while an excess of weight
is taken care of by throwing over ballast. In fight, correction may also be
effected by flying the ship nose up or nose down. In this case the hull acts
somewhat as the wings of an airplane, and the reaction of the air upon it
gives dynamic lift, which increases the lift if the nose is pointed upwards,
and augments the weight if the nose is pointed down. This method of cor-
rection, however, is limited in its application, and, while it may be used to
overcome slight discrepancies in equilibrium, it cannot take care of that
caused by the burning of fuel. This obviously results in a reduction of the
gross weight of the ship, which calls for the release of lifting gas to
maintain equilibrium.
This is an expensive proceeding, especially with helium. To operate the
Shenandoah at cruising speed, it would be necessary to valve helium to
the value of $1,000 per hour. Even if this could be afforded, there is not
enough helium available to refill ships operated in this fashion. Conse-
quently, if helium is to be used at all, some means must be found to prevent
its waste. With water recovery the gross weight of the ship may be kept
constant, so that it becomes unnecessary to release any lifting gas.
With hydrogen, it is usually considered that the gas is so cheap that it
may be allowed to escape without serious loss. Alternatively, it is some-
times argued that water recovery involves the installation of weighty ap-
paratus, and that the reduction in useful load accompanying this cannot
be tolerated. Figures of actual costs are unfortunately not yet available, but
it is possible to show that the saving in the cost of hydrogen is greatly in
excess of the value of the space sacrificed.
Taking as a basis estimates made by Commander Burney for his proposed
service from England to India, which is now actually being proceeded in
a modified form, and converting his figures on the basis of five dollars to
a pound, his cost of hydrogen per annum becomes $500,000. The cor-
responding figure for depreciation, insurance, and repairs is $1,750,000 per
annum. On the basis of the results obtained on the Shenandoah the weight
of apparatus necessary to effect water recovery may be placed at less than
2 per cent of the gross lift of the ship; on the large ships now authorized
for the England to India service the deadweight will amount to 50 per cent
of the gross lift. To restore the original useful load to a ship equipped with
water recovery would therefore involve increasing its gross lift by 4 per
cent. This would increase the capital charges by an approximately cor-
responding amount, so that, to carry the useful load originally contemplated,
water recovery involves an increase in the annual charges of $70,000, and
offers a saving of $500,000. The ratio between these figures indicates that
water recovery should be a very useful proposition, even with hydrogen.
In actual practice it is probable that water recovery will result, not in a
loss of useful load as considered above, but in an actual increase. An
airship must carry emergency ballast, and without water recovery this must
be taken aboard at the start and is a deduction from possible useful load.
With the new system the recovered water may be used as ballast, so that
more useful load may be taken on at the start and the ballast manufactured
en route. This might involve the possible discharge of fuel to meet an emer-
gency arising early in the course of a flight, but special "slip tanks" are
provided for emergencies in any case, and to extend their use to this added
case would seem permissible since it would not prejudice the safety of the
ship and would permit useful gains.
The amount of useful load that must be sacrificed to provide emergency
ballast is a very debatable point. The war-time practice of the Germans,
it is understood, was to fly with no ballast at all; it can only be assumed that
they treated maneuvering risks as added war hazards and risked the loss of
ships from this cause in order to obtain increased military value. Such risks
cannot be taken in peace time. An idea of the absolute safe minimum may


  p. 1771 (#703)                      #

1925]
1771
Professional Notes
be gained from the amount carried by the R-34 in crossing the Atlantic:
this represented 5 per cent of the gross lift, and in that case, if ever, useful
load could not be sacrificed unnecessarily. One or two examples of emer-
gencies in which such ballast would prove useful may serve to illustrate the
necessity for an adequate reserve.
The first is the loss of a gas cell. The material forming the walls is a
very light fabric, and though strong enough to meet all ordinary loads, is
none the less delicate and liable to be punctured by accident. Such a
puncture could occur, for example, through some articles coming in contact
with a propeller blade. This would damage the propeller, and the article,
probably with pieces of the propeller in addition, would be thrown outwards.
As there is about one chance in three of any one of these pieces being thrown
into the hull, and in this case the one piece would very probably also pierce
the gas cell, the danger is an appreciable one. It cannot be said for certain
that a careless passenger might not drop something overboard and that this
article might not cause the puncturing of a gas cell, nor is it certain that
a cell might not be punctured from some other accidental cause just as a
surface ship is liable to have a watertight compartment flooded by accident.
ſt therefore seemis prudent to require that an airship should be able to
keep the air in such an emergency. To do this she must be able to jettison
weight equal to the lift of the lost cell, and under present conditions of
operation there are times toward the end of a flight when she would not
be able to do this, since the weight to be sacrificed might amount to 9 or 10
per cent of the gross lift in the case of the largest cell. With water re-
covery the emergency could be met in the early stages of a flight as well as
at present, and could also be met at any other time without involving any
additional sacrifice in lift.
Another emergency that might arise is the complete exhaustion of the
fuel supply. A large reserve will, of course, always be carried, but even
when this amounts to 50 per cent of that necessary for a given journey under
normal conditions, head winds might be encountered and the ship find her-
self with insufficient fuel to reach a base. Without ballast she would in all
probability come to earth during the first night after the stoppage of her
engines. This would not be a violent descent, but a gradual fall due to the
loss of lift from temparature variations between gas and air. In the worst,
and usual case, the gas would become superheated during the day, attaining
a temperature in excess of atmospheric, due to the absorption of some
of the sun's heat by the outer cover and the transference of a portion of
this to the gas itself. This would cause what is known as false lift, and
its immediate effect on a ship with engines stopped would be to cause it to
rise to pressure height and to lose gas until the remaining lift balanced the
weight of the ship. As soon as the sun ceased to shine the gas would start
to cool to the atmospheric temperature, the volume and the lift would fall
in consequence, and the ship would descend. A similar effect might occur,
due to a rise in the air temperature. So long as air and gas remained at
the same temperature and the gas cells were less than full, equilibrium would
not be disturbed, but as there would probably be a lag in the rise of the gas
temperature there would be a loss of lift. Even though this loss of lift
might be small, if the ship had no ballast available she would settle to the
ground.
Under such conditions a commercial ship would probably find herself with
perhaps 5 per cent of water ballast and this would enable her to keep the
air for one night. The next day superheat would probably occur again
and on the loss of this she would come to earth. With water recovery,
about 25 per cent of the gross lift would be available as ballast and a ship
so equipped could stay up for several days, during which time something
could probably be done toward rescuing her.


  p. 1772 (#704)                      #

1772
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
With hydrogen there is a risk of the destruction of the ship through
the burning of the lifting gas; this is eliminated by the use of helium-at a
price. This price is 8 per cent of the gross lift, which is a very severe tax
on the performance of an airship. While the added safety conferred, as
compared with hydrogen as used in the past, may justify this price, the
possibility exists of securing safety by other means at a lesser price. For
example, mixtures of helium and hydrogen, and combination gas cells with
the hydrogen protected by a layer of helium, have been suggested. These
may or may not be successful; but another method is available as an adjunct
to water recovery. This is the insulation of the hydrogen by a surrounding
layer of cooled exhaust gas.
It is known that such an insulation is remarkably effective as a protec-
tion against fire, being proof even against incendiary bullets except when
these are directed in a stream against a single spot. Nitrogen was first sug-
gested for this purpose, and the use of exhaust gas is at present being
strongly advocated by Commander Boothby for the large ships now being
started in England. By merely filling the space between the gas cells and
the outer cover with exhaust gas and modifying the ventilation arrange-
ments, it is at least possible that a degree of protection against fire com-
parable with that obtainable from helium may be secured. There is little
doubt that it would prove completely effective against lightning, and for
peace time uses would probably fail only against a fire that would endanger
the ship without igniting the hydrogen. Even on a helium ship there is the
danger of fire from gasoline. It is very difficult to keep the long fuel lines
absolutely tight, and a leak in the keel space offers a better chance for the
start of a fire than the hydrogen does. Such a fire might be extinguished on
a helium ship, whereas it would probably spread to hydrogen were that
gas present, and cause the destruction of the ship. With exhaust gas in-
sulation the fuel tanks and lines will be within the insulation space so that
the danger of a fire from the gasoline will be less than in a helium filled
ship without insulation.
This protection cannot be secured for nothing, but if used in conjunction
with water recovery the necessary exhaust is available, ready cooled, and
the cost of completing the installation should not exceed one per cent of the
gross lift, at a liberal estimate. This figure covers apparatus to render the
gas non-injurious to the gas cells, fabric partitions within the hull, and gas
delivery arrangements.
Finally, water recovery offers two additional minor advantages; it acts
as a complete silencer to the exhaust noise, which is a matter of distinct
interest when passengers are being carried, and the recovered water may be
filtered and used for purposes other than ballast. It has actually been
rendered potable, and should certainly be available for radiator reserve and
for passengers' use for washing, and so forth.
Summarizing, then, with helium the use of water recovery to conserve
the gas is essential, and even with hydrogen conservation results in a very
considerable net saving; the process provides reserve buoyancy, and hence
protection against emergencies, in excess of that which could reasonably
be provided by other means; it makes possible an increase in the useful
load, since the apparatus weighs less than the minimum landing ballast
that must be carried, which may be manufactured en route instead of being
taken on at the start; it provides protection against fire comparable with
that obtainable from helium at a price in lift of one per cent of the gross
lift as against 8 per cent; it completely silences the noise from the engine
exhausts, and provides water suitable for radiator and for domestic purposes.


  p. 1773 (#705)                      #

1925)
1773
Professional Notes
ENGINEERING
The Motor Passenger Liner "Asturias"
The Engineer, 10 July, 1925.—(See Frontispiece). On the seventh inst.,
the motor ship Asturias was launched from Messrs. Harland and Wolff's
East Yard at Belfast by Her Excellency the Duchess of Abercorn in
the presence of Lord Kylsant, the chairman of the Royal Mail Steam
Packet Company and a distinguished company. The occasion was of un-
usual importance, not only because of the substantial addition to the Royal
Mail fleet that the vessel represents, followed as she is to be by a sister ship
well on the way, but also because she is the largest and most powerful
vessel that has yet been produced. The use of motor driven vessels for
small sizes has been notably increasing for some years, but opinions are
divided as to their suitability for large powers and heavy tonnage. Messrs.
Harland and Wolff's reputation as successful pioneers in the increase of the
size of vessels and their propelling machinery makes their production of
this vessel a piece of practical evidence of which account must be taken
in the controversy now pending.
The Asturias is of 22,000 tons gross register, and how far the Royal
Mail Company has gone since it began to carry mail, passengers and cargo
in 1851, is suggested fairly by reference to the R.M.S. Teviot, with which
its interprise began, a vessel of 1,744 tons, propelled by paddle wheels with
the help of sails. The leading dimensions of the Asturias are: length,
655 ft. 8 in.; breadth, 78 ft.; and depth, 45 ft.; and she is driven by a pair of
Harland, Burmeister and Wain, 8-cylinder four-cycle, double-acting Diesel
engines, running at 155 r.p.m. The engines develop 10,000 i.h.p. each, and
deliver their 20,000 h.p. on two shafts, thus enabling the normal twin-
crew practice to be maintained. The engines are shown in Frontispiece, and,
as will be seen, follow generally the lines of previous four-cycle double-
acting engines by the same makers. Two three-stage air compressors ar-
ranged in tandem are mounted at the forward end of each engine, and driven
off an extension of the crankshaft, providing compressed air for fuel injec-
tion. The output of each of these compressors is by itself nearly enough to
serve the engine at full output. The fuel pumps are also driven off the main
engine. The engines have forced lubrication throughout, oil serving also
for cooling the piston, and fresh water being used in the cylinder jackets
for cooling. Maneuvering air is provided by three two-stage air compressors,
charging six steel reservoirs at twenty-five atmospheres, and like the other
engine room auxiliaries, the compressors are electrically driven by inde-
pendent motors. A small emergency steam-driven compressor is also
provided, and two oil-fired vertical boilers supply steam for cooking pur-
poses, and so forth.
Supercharging
The Engineer, 10 July, 1925.—The production of a maximum of work
from a minimum of material, consistent with reliable service, is the broad
basis of commercial efficiency which finds ample expresssion in engineering
products of all kinds. It is reflected in the progress of internal combustion
engineering, by continual efforts to increase the power output from a given
weight of material, an aim which, in addition to its commercial economic
aspect, possesses features of technical importance, as, for instance, in aero-
nautical engineering, where weight reduction is of primary importance.
For some time internal combustion engineers have been aware that they
are fast approaching finality in the application of this fundamental com-
mercial principle to the simpler, long-tried types of engines, and that any
considerable further advance in power output is only to be expected from
some new departure. A radical change, however, is improbable, and is


  p. 1774 (#706)                      #

1774
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
not looked for by those concerned in the face of the proven thoroughness
of the principles already applied. Rather is attention being turned to the
development of auxiliary mechanisms, by which to improve the efficiency
of the general types now so well established. Thus, we hear of extensive
researches in progress on waste heat recovery and on supercharging. It
is with the latter that we are now more particularly concerned.
Supercharging is rather an ambiguous expression, in that it is applied
unconditionally to any means of employing a compressor for introducing
the charge into an internal combustion engine. In consequence, it frequently
gives rise to misconceptions. Although known before, this particular use
of the compressor first found serious application during the war, to over-
come the loss of engine power, caused by the rarified atmosphere, when
flying at high altitudes. In effect, it increased the density of the air, thereby
insuring a combustible mixture of the same quality, and having the same
properties as when flying near the ground. But, it is open to question
whether some word other than supercharging should not be found to describe
what, after all, is only a method of correcting the deterioration of normal
combustion conditions. Although the cycle is similar, the conditions are quite
different when the compressor is applied for introducing the mixture to the
combustion chamber of a land engine. In the case of the aircraft engine, the
compressor is necessary at high altitudes to maintain the normal fuel con-
sumption, i.e., to provide sufficient air to maintain the normal power output;
but in the case of the land engine the compressor is applied solely to increase
the specific power, or power output, in proportion to the capacity of the cylin-
der, and so involves increased fuel consumption. This, after a certain stage
is passed, means increased mean temperature. General application of the
term supercharging to both sets of conditions gives rise to misunderstandings
between those more intimately concerned with aero-engines who do not
experience this temperature effect, and others who are primarily. interested
in obtaining higher specific powers at ground level. Supercharging is the
subject of considerable experimental work now in progress in this country,
Italy, Sweden, and elsewhere. It is recognized that far-reaching effects may
result from the perfection of a method of introducing into engines a weight
of mixture considerably greater than that which corresponds with the normal
capacity of the cylinders. In fact, the principle, in addition to offering
higher powers from a given weight of metal, holds out prospects of over-
coming one of the inherent characteristics which limits the utility of the
internal combustion engine, namely, its lack of flexibility. If that can be
achieved, we are within sight of what will be a welcome and revolutionary
development in motor car design-the elimination of the gear box, an un-
desirable device which is responsible for the wastage of millions of gallons
of fuel. A reduction in the size of the motor car engine to that required
for normal working conditions on level roads, with the gear box replaced
by a supercharging device, which would provide the necessary reserve of
power for hill-climbing and bursts of speed, is not an inconceivable develop-
ment. Moreover, as the motor would, generally, be run at a speed corre-
sponding to the maximum efficiency, such a system would offer a solution
of the variable power engine problem, and, indeed, a complete solution if
the effect of the supercharger could be proportioned to any load on the
motor. Another prospect held out by the supercharging principle is that
of utilizing the heat generated by the compressor, and the pulverizing effect
of the air blast, to facilitate the combustion of heavier fuels.
It is realized that much costly research will be necessary before the
developments foreshadowed can be brought to fruition, and the problem
appears to be, to a considerable extent, a metallurgical one. Laboratory
tests have indicated the possibility of increasing the power of existing
motors up to 20 per cent, by means of supercharging, but the temperatures
attained are prohibitive, and cause rapid deterioration of material. The


  p. 1775 (#707)                      #

1925)
1775
Professional Notes
risk of injury is not entirely absent with increases of only 10 per cent,
and as increases approaching that figure are still well within the range of
possibility for many engines, by general improvements and re-design of
existing features, no general development in supercharging seems probable
until metallurgical developments permit the fullest application of the prin-
ciple.
German Admiralty's Proposed Rotorship
The Nautical Gazette, 18 July, 1925.-Details are now available of the
new rotor-ship which will be built by the German Admiralty, says Fairplay.
The vessel will have dimensions of 85 by 13.20 by 5.80 meters, and a
deadweight capacity of 3,000 tons. The hull will be that of an ordinary
freighter, with a cruiser stern and a Flettner rudder. The main propelling
machinery consists of two six-cylinder single-acting four-cycle Diesel engines,
running at 300 revolutions per minute. The power, which amounts to 1,050
b.h.p., is transmitted to a single-screw propeller by a Vulcan hydraulic
clutch gear, and when the vessel is being driven by the wind the engines
can be disengaged and the propeller allowed to revolve freely. The screw
propeller will alone give the ship a speed of ten knots, and the power taken
from the wind may be used either to increase the speed or to replace one or
two engines while these are stopped.
The rotor tower is placed amidships, and has a height of 28 meters
(92 ft.), and a diameter of 7 meters (23 ft.), while the Buckau had two
towers of a height of 15.6 meters (51 ft.), and 2.8 meters (9.2 ft.) diameter.
The projected area of the tower of the new vessel, which is a measure
of the driving power, is thus more than double that of the Buckau towers.
Fine Performance of Motorships
The Nautical Gasette, 25 July, 1925.—The remarkable performance of
the motorships City of Panama and City of San Francisco, operated by
the Panama Mail Steamship Company in the California-Central American
trade, is exciting much favorable comment on the Pacific Coast, and it is
hinted that the owners intend, at some future date, to build other vessels
of this type for the Central American route. The two vessels have now
been operating more than a year, and their repair bills have been almost
wholly negligible. In eight months the City of Panama has required only
a small welding job, costing less than $5, and the upkeep record of the
City of San Francisco is little, if any, less impressive. They are both
powered within twin six-cylinder, four-cycle, single-acting, directly rever-
sible crosshead-type Burmeister and Wain Diesels, developing 1,400 horse-
power, and making 130 revolutions per minute at full speed. The vessels
were built in Sweden but now fly the Panama flag.
The “Aorangi”
The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July, 1925.–From time
to time paragraphs appear in the columns of the daily papers, both home
and colonial, relative to the service performance of the motor liner Aorangi,
which aroused so much interest when she left this country for her maiden
trip early this year, and from these reports it would seem that both owners
and builders must have every reason to be satisfied with their choice of
Diesel engines for the particular service in question. We understand that
on her maiden voyage the Aorangi encountered extremely heavy weather,
both in the Atlantic and in the Pacific, so much so that part of her super-
structure was carried away, and had it not been for the regularity and
precision with which the engines ran, the ship would have been placed
in a very awkward position. One of the latest reports says that she left


  p. 1776 (#708)                      #

1776
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Auckland for Vancouver many hours late owing to a severe rain storm
and that she succeeded in reaching Vancouver several hours ahead of her
scheduled time, thus proving that she has a very ample reserve of speed
and power. The Aorangi is the pioneer large passenger and mail motor
liner and, as such, she occupies a very important position in the marine
engineering world because other owners and other builders are watching
her performance with more than usual care in order to obtain an indication
as to the desirability or otherwise of fitting their new tonnage with Diesel
engines. The next large motor passenger and mail liner, the Gripsholm, was
due originally to go on service early this year but, so far, owing to a
series of strikes in Denmark, where her main engines are being built, she
has been regrettably delayed, and it seems that we shall not see her on the
Atlantic until toward the end of the year. In this case, also, the enterprise
of both builders and owners is to be greatly admired. The Gripsholm will
be as much a pioneer as the Aorangi, but in a different direction, because
she will be the first large ship to be fitted with double-acting Diesel engines;
also she will be the first large motorship on the Atlantic service. The Pacific
service and, in particular, the service which the Union Steam Ship Company
of New Zealand Limited maintains, has seen many pioneering developments
in marine engineering, including the combination steam reciprocating engine
and low-pressure turbine, which has worked very successfully indeed.
6
.....................
2,000
German Diesel Engine Practice*
The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July, 1925.—The new
single-acting six-cylinder four-stroke cycle crosshead type M.A.N. Diesel
engine is the outcome of long experience, both in the construction of low
and high-speed engines of the trunk piston type, as well as in earlier types
of slow-running crosshead engines. The particular engine described in
the present article may be considered as typical as other sizes and powers,
and has the following principal dimensions :
Maximum length ....
.....10,850 mm. (36 ft.).
Maximum width ......... ............... 3,500 mm. (11.5 ft.).
Maximum height above center of shaft ... 7,080 mm. (23.3 ft.).
Maximum height above base of bedplate .. 7,880 mm. (25.8 ft.).
Cylinder, diameter .......
700 mm. (27.5 in.).
Stroke ..
1,400 mm. (4.6 ft.).
Number of cylinders .....
Brake horse-power
Revolutions per min......
108
Mean effective pressure
5.17 atmos. (76 lb. per sq. in.).
Injection air compressor, d eters-
ist stage ......,
700 mm. (27.5 in.).
2nd stage ...........
620 mm. (24.4 in.).
3rd stage ..............
150 mm. (5.94).
Piston Stroke ............
500 mm. (19.65 in.).
Crank shaft, diameter ...,
455 mm. (17.85 in.).
Weight of engine with air bottles, exclusive of flywheel, exhaust mani-
fold and fittings, 270 tons approximate.
The cast iron bedplate is built in two parts, each bolted together. The
bedplate supports eight identical and interchangeable shaft bearings, and
carries below it a steel plate oil drip trough; the used oil being led through
two holes in the trough to the lubricating oil pumps. The main bearings
are lined with white metal, the liners themselves being easily withdrawable.
The upper half of the liners is prevented from rotating, holes being made
in them to enable the bearings to be readily examined. The bearing caps
Abstract of an article appearing in the Zeitschrift des Vereines deutscher Ingenieure.
June 6, 1925.


  p. 1777 (#709)                      #

1925]
1777
Professional Notes
are held down by long through bolts. These, because of their length, are
much less likely to fracture than short tap screws.The crank shaft is made
in two main parts with forged screwed-on flanges; each half is built up by
shrinking on the crank webs to the pins. The scantlings of the shaft satis-
fies Classification Society requirements. The cranks are set at 120°.
The cylinder columns, eight pairs in all, are made of cast iron, of hollow
rectangular section, and are placed immediately above the crank bearings,
thus enabling the spread of the columns to be reduced to a minimum. The
type of column bolting adopted reduces the length of the engine consider-
ably and makes the parts more readily accessible. The cylinders are held
down by long steel bolts, passing through the columns to the bedplate.
The crosshead guides are screwed to adjustable blocks between the columns
on the control side of the engine. These assist considerably to stiffen up
the columns longitudinally. Each set of four pairs of columns supports
one three-cylinder unit, the two units being bolted together over the whole
width. In the designing of these units, as well as the columns and bedplates,
care was taken to evolve a 'form free from likelihood of casting defects.
In each block of cylinders the shrunk cylinder liners are exchangeable.
Between the cylinder block and cover a special cast iron cooling ring is
fitted which takes the top of the cylinder liner, absorbs its heat, leads it
appreciably away, and thus obviates heat stresses in the cylinder castings.
The cylinder covers are each held down by eight bolts. These pass through
the cooling ring, and are bedded to the cylinders. The cover is fitted inside
with a dividing wall placed near the under face of the cover. This wall
serves to restrain the cooling water to the bottom with a consequently
higher speed and greater cooling efficiency.
Between the piston proper (Fig. 1) and the piston rod flange a separate
head is fitted whose ribbing is so designated to convey the cooling water
at suitable speed from the center to the sides of the piston. To supply and
lead away the cooling water telescopic tubes are used, fitted with stuffing
boxes which prevent the leakage of the cooling water into the lubricating
oil. The outer of these telescopic tubes is only connected at its lower end;
the inner and stronger tube is screwed to the piston. The outer, elastic
tube carries the stuffing box and readily adapts itself to the heat of the
engine, thus economizing in packing and ensuring adequate tightness with
but little attention. Water hammer in the supply and exhaust tubes
is counteracted by air vessels. The piston and crank chambers are separated
by plates fitted with stuffing boxes which prevent the dirty oil coming
from the piston and cylinder walls passing through to the oil lubricating
the cranks. The crank shaft and connecting rod arrangement is of the
usual type. The steel connecting rod head is forked and has bronze bear-
ings, the lower crank pin bearings and the crosshead slipper block being
lined with white metal. The crosshead guides are water cooled.
The three-stage air compressor is driven by a bell crank transmission from
an eccentric placed between the two main halves of the crank shafting at
the mid-length of the engine. The second stage is arranged below the first,
and this insures sufficient distribution of the loads coming on the eccentric
and driving pin. The air cooler and oil separator are fitted immediately
adjacent to the compressor.
The engine is lubricated on the forced system, oil being led into each
crank bearing and thence through the center of the crank shaft. As the
shaft is hollow throughout its entire length any disturbance in the oil
circulation can be isolated to one bearing.
In the cylinder cover are arranged the inlet, exhaust, fuel, starting, and
safety valves. The fuel valve is shown in Fig. 2, and is so constructed that
packing previously considered necessary for injection air is avoided. The
needle valve is in an enclosed casing which also contains the rocking lever


  p. 1778 (#710)                      #

1778
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings


U
Lub. Oil
HEERDE
Test Valve
da Fuer
Supply
Check
Valve
SECT. CD
Lub. 0,1
ib
ot
B
101100
SECT. A-8.
FIG. 1.-Piston COOLING ARRANGEMENT AND FUEL VALVE DETAILS
for controlling the needle. On this rocking lever an encased pointer
stamp also acts, and this carries the block upon which the fuel valve lever
presses in opening the needle valve. The stamp previously referred to has a
ball seat at its lower end which closes and opens with the needle valve,
thus avoiding all air loss. The springs of the inlet and exhaust valves are
external, the exhaust valve casing being water cooled. The valve seat is
made of special cast iron connected to the steel valve spindle. The starting
air valve is designed to start up under the pressure of the starting air;
!
0 Overflow
Valve
Der From Injection
Air Container
To Fuel
Valves.
sonjen
24
Fig. 2.--DETAILS OF THE FUEL VALVE


  p. 1779 (#711)                      #

1925)
1779
Professional Notes

Max. Charge
Zero Charge
Running. 6
Running/3.
VIEW FROM
FORWARD.
IE
dib
Stop, Start
Fuel Out
Test Pipe
To Fuel
Valves
no
Up Gear.
Fig. 3.-FUEL PUMP DETAILS
it is, however, controlled by the starting cam. The valve thus only opens
when the pressure in the cylinder is lower than in the air lead and auto-
matically closes when ignition takes place. The escape of hot gases with
this design of starting valve is thus avoided. The safety valve is designed
to take effect at pressures exceeding fifty atmospheres. The valves are
controlled by rocking levers from the camshaft at the level of the cylinder
Reversing Positions
Ahead Astern
E
Test Cock
-PI
Ahead Chamber
Astern Chamber
BE
SECTION A-8.
Fig. 4.-DETAILS OF REVERSING GEAR


  p. 1780 (#712)                      #

1780
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
covers. It is driven from the main shaft between Nos. 3 and 4 cylinders
through a pair of bevel wheels and a lower and upper pair of cone wheels.
The upper pair of cone wheels reduces the shaft revolutions in the ratio of
2:1. The fuel pump shown in Fig. 3 is placed on the camshaft side of the
engine near the central platform. The horizontal intermediate shaft for
driving the central shaft carries an eccentric from which the fuel pump is
driven. The arrangements for varying the fuel change, and hence the
engine power, are fitted to the fuel pump. A safety valve is also fitted
to this pump in order to cut out the fuel supply in case of engine racing or
propeller fracture.
In reversing the engine the camshaft, which carries distinct sets of
ahead and astern cams, is moved axially (see Fig. 4). This motion, at the
instant of reversal, results in a rotation of the valve lever shaft, thus lifting
simultaneously all valve levers and leaving the cams free. The necessary
power for reversing is supplied by compressed air from the injection or
starting air container, this container being connected up with one or other of
the oil chambers by pulling over the reversing levers. The resulting oil
pressure moves the piston, whose motion is transmitted through a rod and
pinion drive to a shaft which, through a cone wheel drive, rotates the cam-
shaft. This, through the movement of the cam levers, displaces the shaft
axially. Finally, the valve levers are brought down to the cams by further
rotation of their shaft.
In starting up compressed air of fifteen to twenty atmospheres pressure
is used. The cylinders are split up into two groups the first of which is
started up on fuel from the control-platform, while the other half is
operated with starting air. In this way it is insured that an effective torque
exists during reversal, thus preventing the sticking of the engine. Stops
are fitted to prevent the starting lever being used before the reversing lever
is hard over. Similarly, the reversing lever can only be moved when the
starting lever is shut off. When the starting lever is shut off the fuel
pumps for the corresponding cylinder group are similarly shut off, and
fuel can only be drawn when the starting lever is moved in.
The hand levers for starting and reversing, for the fuel supply, the in-
jection air pressure, air pump, and lubricating oil pressure regulators are all
placed at the control platform.
Any type of Diesel oil can be used as fuel. With coal tar oil or viscous
high ignition point oils, heating of the oil is necessary in conjunction with the
use of the ignition-oil method of starting up. The specific fuel consump-
tion at full load amounts to 180 g/b.h.p./hour (0.457 lb.) with fuel of a
calorific value of 10,000 k. cal./kg. (18,000 B.Th.U. per lb.). The lubricat-
ing oil consumption amounts to between 0.6 and 0.9 g./b.h.p./hour. Alto-
gether some twenty engines of the above type are at present under construc-
tion for German, Swedish, Dutch, and Italian owners.
ORDNANCE
Gunnery in the Battle of Jutland
By Hector C. Bywater, Baltimore Sun, 30 July, 1925.--London, July 20.-
Although to the general public the Battle of Jutland is ancient history
now, it still remains a subject of lively debate in service circles everywhere.
Early descriptions of the battle have fallen into discredit, for they were
written when the evidence was meager and conflicting, and are therefore
full of inaccuracies. Even Lord Jellicoe's version in his book, The Grand
Fleet, is no longer accepted as authoritative, since it omits all mention of
some of the most important German maneuvers that were executed during
the combat.
High praise is awarded by many British critics to the study of Jutland
which appears in Captain Frothingham's new volume of World War naval
history, although the author, as an American, maintains a perfectly impar-


  p. 1781 (#713)                      #

1925)
1781
Professional Notes
tial attitude, and distributes praise or censure without regard to national
susceptibilities. He has certainly contrived to draw the clearest picture of
Jutland that has come under my notice, and I have waded through a vast
amount of British and German literature on this topic.
From the viewpoint of tactical leadership, the most arresting feature of
the battle was the masterly way in which the German Admiral Scheer
handled his fleet. Three times in succession did he swing the whole force
round by a maneuver (Kehrtwendung) which the British commander had
deemed impossible. In this way he was able to extricate his feet from a
most dangerous position, leaving his opponent completely baffled.
In the German naval staff history of Jutland, published last month, the
escape of the high sea fleet is attributed partly to ineffective British gun-
nery. The same theme is developed on rather sensational lines by an article
in the latest issue of the Marine Rundschau, the German semi-official re-
view. The author, Captain Punt, of the German Navy, submits some very
striking figures taken from official sources. His contention is that British
naval gunnery was inferior not only at Jutland but in every engagement of
the war.
He begins by drawing a contrast between the actions of Coronel and the
Falklands. In the former battle the Germans had an advantage in number
of big guns, but weather conditions were unfavorable for good shooting.
In spite of this handicap the Scharnhorst and Gneisenau sank the Good
Hope and Monmouth in less than an hour, while they themselves received
only a few superficial hits.
But, if Captain Punt were an impartial critic, he would have mentioned
that the British ships were old, their guns of low power and their crews
largely composed of raw recruits and elderly reservists, whereas the Ger-
man ships had been in commission several years and had taken all the
Kaiser's gunnery prizes on the China station.
At the Falklands, where the British superiority in weight of gunfire and
speed was overwhelming, it took hours to destroy the Scharnhorst and
Gneisenau, which scored a great many hits on their opponents before going to
the bottom. In view of the disparity between the forces engaged it certainly
is remarkable that the German squadron should have survived so long.
At the Dogger Bank action in January, 1915, five British battle cruisers,
mounting forty big guns of 13.5 and 12-in. caliber, were opposed to three
similar German ships armed with twenty-eight guns of 11 and 12 in., and the
armored cruiser Blücher, carrying only 8-in. guns. In this fight, it is claimed,
the Germans inflicted twenty hits and received only six, apart from those
suffered by the Blücher when, after being disabled, she became the target
for concentrated fire at close range.
Here again, however, Captain Punt suppresses some important facts-
namely, that the Blücher was knocked out by a British shell fired at 18,000
yards and that the Seydlitz had two turrets wrecked and 150 men killed by
one shell, also fired at extreme range.
Coming to Jutland, he reminds us that in the initial stage Beatty had six
battle cruisers with forty-eight big guns, against five German ships with
forty-four guns, mainly of smaller caliber. The Germans began hitting
first, and in less than an hour had sunk two British battle cruiesrs and
damaged two others, while they themselves received only ten hits, none of
which caused serious injury. In this phase the total number of hits re-
ceived is given as follows: British, 36; German, 10.
Each successive phase of the battle is then reviewed, and it is shown how
at one period only did the Germans receive more punishment than they gave,
this being due to the British use of the Scott firing director, a device which
the German fleet did not at that time possess.
There is no doubt that the Germans shot splendidly in this fight, es-
pecially their battle cruisers. They got onto the target almost at once,


  p. 1782 (#714)                      #

1782
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
holding it under fire with rapid salvos that pitched close together with
little or no "spread.” Often the four shells of one salvo would crash
home together in a British ship, and when that occurred the effect was
usually catastrophic.
The appalling destructiveness of German shells was not the least singular
feature of the battle. Three British battle cruisers and two armored cruisers
were sunk outright after short bursts of fire and a third armored cruiser
was so cruelly punished that she had to be left to founder. On the other
hand, the German ships seemed proof against the heaviest hammering. It
is clear that the British projectiles were lacking in efficiency, either through
defective fuses or an unsuitable bursting charge.
At Jutland the British feet fired 4,598 heavy projectiles and the Ger-
man fleet 3,597, the percentage of hits being, respectively, 2.17 and 3.33. On
the British side the heaviest guns were 15-in., the majority being 13.5-in.
The Germans had nothing larger than 12-in. and a third of their ships had
only Il-in. guns.
Regarded as a gunnery test, Jutland was undeniably a success for the
Germans. Whether their brilliant shooting was due to better material or
better methods of training, or to a combination of both, is an open question.
It is acknowledged that their range-finding instruments were much superior
to the British.
In the sphere of naval gunnery the latter appear to have concentrated
on quantity, the Germans on quality. The British Navy, on the outbreak of
the war, was still permeated with the doctrines of Lord Fisher, who made
a fetish of mere bigness—the biggest ships, the biggest guns. But, he had
a sublime disregard for detail, which was precisely where the Germans
excelled.
If the percentage of hits at Jutland, as given above, is correct, it offers
food for thought. At Santiago in 1898 the American percentage is said
to have been 1.4. At Tsushima the Japanese percentage was claimed as
3.2. If the next naval battle is fought out at anything above 20,000 yards a
lower percentage may be looked for, despite the improvement in fire-control
methods.
All of which imparts an air of unreality to discussions on gun elevation
which postulate a decisive range of 25,000 yards or more.
MERCHANT MARINE
World's Shipbuilding Touches Lowest Level Since the War
The Nautical Gazette, 18 July, 1925.—A new low record in world ship-
building since the late war is shown by returns covering all maritime coun-
tries for the quarter ended June 30 last, says a statement just issued by Lloyd's
Register of Shipping. Increases in tonnage orders in the past quarter, as
compared with the previous one, shown by the shipyards of the United States,
Italy, Japan, and some of the smaller shipbuilding nations. were more than
offset by the decreases in Great Britain and Ireland, Germany, France,
Holland and Denmark. The general contrast between the two last quarters
is shown by the following table, the figures representing gross tons of
shipping :
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
United States..
92,001
81,728
Great Britain and Ireland ............ 1,093,587 1,165,468
Other countries ....
.. 1,184,243 1,149,714
World Total .....
.....
2,369,831 2,396,910
The previous low mark, of September 30, 1923, showed a total of ap-
proximately 99,000 gross tons for the United States, 1,271,000 tons for


  p. 1783 (#715)                      #

1925]
1783
Professional Notes
Great Britain and Ireland, and 1,007,000 tons for all other countries com-
bined, making the world total at that period, 2,377,000 tons, so that the
present decline from that figure is not a sharp one. It compares, however,
with 2,616,000 gross tons for June 30, 1924, since which time the decline
has been a steady one.
But, Lloyd's Register points out, the decrease is accompanied by a
falling off in orders for steam tonnage. Once again, the figures for con-
struction of vessels equipped with internal-combustion engines show an
advance, so that now almost 50 per cent of the world's shipbuilding is com-
posed of motor vessels. In Great Britain and Ireland motorships represent
36.5 per cent of the total construction, while the figure for other maritime
countries is 57-3 per cent, making the proportion for all countries combined
47.7 per cent, as compared with 42 per cent for the quarter ended March
31 last, and only 28 per cent a year prior to that. The tonnage of motorships
building during the past two quarters compares as follows, in gross tons:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland ......
399,070
359,920
Other countries .....
730,842 661,711
World total ........
1,129,912 1,021,631
It will be noticed that, while on construction of all kinds, Great Britain
and Ireland's share is nearly half the world's total, they are constructing
only a little more than a third of the total motor tonnage.
According to the returns, the construction work being done in all coun-
tries under supervision of Lloyd's Register, and intended to be classed with
that Society, aggregates 1,587,386 gross tons, of which 876,143 tons represent
orders contracted for in Great Britain and Ireland. Lloyd's, therefore, is
supervising more than two thirds of the world's shipbuilding, and more than
80 per cent of that in Great Britain and Ireland. Both percentages show a
gain over those for the previous quarter.
A new feature of Lloyd's returns gives additional evidence of the develop-
ment of the motorship. Data showing the indicated horsepower of marine
engines now building or being installed throughout the world shows that
out of a total of 1,721,378 i.h.p., 353,144 represents the aggregate for steam
turbines; 559,970 for reciprocating steam engines, and 808,264 for motor
propulsion. The indicated horsepower for motor driven vessels is, therefore,
only 100,000 i.h.p. less than for steam turbines and steam engines combined.
The outlook for an increase in the world's shipbuilding industry is not
brightened by the returns showing the contrast between new orders begun
and tonnage launched. Another sign of depression is seen in the fact that
of the 1,093,000 gross tons of orders with the shipyards of Great Britain
and Ireland, suspension of work has been ordered on 76,000 tons.
The comparison between new orders and launchings of steamers and
motor vessels is not quite so pronounced, however, for the quarter just ended
as for the previous one. During the three months ending June 30, launchings
exceeded new work begun by 171,000 gross tons, while during the three pre-
ceding months, ships sent down the ways exceeded those on which work
was started by more than 210,000 tons. The comparative launchings for the
two periods were as follows, in gross tons :
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland .....
297,517
338,790
Other countries
295,770
267,431
World total
593,287 606,221
The sharp decrease in the amount of tonnage launched by British ship-
yards contrasts with the increase for other countries. This decrease for


  p. 1784 (#716)                      #

1784
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Great Britain and Ireland and increases for the other maritime nations is
also apparent in the comparative figures of new work commenced during the
two quarters, as shown in the following table of gross tonnage:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland ............ 187,445
198,152
Other countries ..... ............ 234,669
196,818
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
.
World total ....
422,114
394,970
During the quarter recently ended, therefore, while the shipyards of Great
Britain and Ireland launched slightly more tonnage than all other countries
together, the new work secured by the British yards was 47,000 gross tons
less than for the other shipbuilding nations, while in the previous quarter,
Great Britain and Ireland led in both launchings and new work.
One direction in which Great Britain and Ireland gained during the last
quarter, while other countries fell back, was that of tanker construction. It
is also noted by Lloyd's Register, in this connection, that while no tankers
were reported to be building in the United States during the first three
months of this year, 9,500 gross tons are now stated to be under way there.
The gains of the shipyards of Great Britain and Ireland during the quarter
ended June 30 were 43,000 tons, while the other nations combined showed a
decrease of about 23,000 tons, as indicated by the following table of gross
tonnage:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland .............. 165,467 122,128
Other countries ............
.... 206,800
230,015
World total ....................... 372,267
352,143
Little change was recorded in the ranking of the various shipbuilding
nations during the past quarter. France, which stood third during the first
quarter of the year, changed places with Italy, which had ranked fourth.
The United States, which had been in seventh position, just ahead of Japan
and behind Denmark, moved up to the latter's place and is now sixth, while
Japan, which was 42,000 tons behind Denmark in the March quarter, is now
only 19,000 tons behind. Lloyd's shows the comparative standings in tonnage
for the quarter, noting a gain for the group of smaller shipbuilding countries
of about 25,000 tons, as indicated in the following table:
June 30, 1925 March 31, 1925
Great Britain and Ireland
1,093,587 1,165,468
Germany ..
407,366
420,860
Italy ......
212,798
164,023
France .......
169,485
187,437
Holland ....
100,682
119,908
United States
92,001
81,728
Denmark
78,061
83,794
Japan .........
59.740
41,755
Other countries.
156,131
131,937
World total .....
.... 2,369,831 2,396,910
The gain made by the United States brings American shipyards only
8,000 gross tons behind the Dutch, who in the first quarter of this year had
a lead over the United States of 38,000 tons.
The proportionate division of shipbuilding now, as compared with a year
ago, is as follows:
Great Britain and Ireland: A decline from 58 per cent to 46 per cent;
Germany, a gain from 12 to 17 per cent; the United States, unchanged at


  p. 1785 (#717)                      #

1925)
1785
Professional Notes
about 4 per cent; other countries combined, an advance from about 26 to 33
per cent. The volume of motorships on order now is 319,000 gross tons
greater than at June 30, 1924, and tanker construction shows a gain of
192,000 tons, being more than double the total for a year ago.
The World's Merchant Shipping
Engineering, 10 July, 1925.—A fitting opportunity is afforded for a review
of the world's merchant shipping by the appearance of the new annual
edition of Lloyd's Register of Shipping. As the Register contains particu-
lars of all the sea-going vessels of 100 tons and upwards, it would be a
tedious task to attempt an analysis of the records, given in alphabetical
order, of the 33,000 vessels of various types which come under this cate-
gory; but fortunately this is rendered unnecessary by the inclusion in the
Register of an admirable series of statistical tables, in which the char-
acteristics of the ships are classified in a variety of ways.
In commenting on the previous edition of the Register, in our issue of
July 18, 1924, we noted an actual decrease of upwards of 1,000,000 tons in
the total merchant shipping, owned in all parts of the world, in the course
of the preceding twelve months, but the corresponding figure for the
period now under review shows a net increase of 617,851 tons. This figure
includes sailing vessels, which in themselves show a decrease of 248,385 tons,
and as this type of craft is relatively unimportant, a more representative
figure is given by considering steam and motor tonnage only, in which
case the increase amounts to 866,236 tons. In view of the continuance
of the world-wide shipping depression which has marked the last few years,
this figure is somewhat unexpected, and cannot fail to give rise to specula-
tion. When commenting on the reduction in the total in the previous
year, we suggested that it was due to the circumstance that the prevailing
low freights had caused shipowners to dispose of large quantities of in-
efficient tonnage for breaking up, and that the continual general depression
of the shipping industry had delayed the construction of tonnage for re-
placement purposes. We are not aware that either freights had appreciably
improved or that the depression has become noticeably less acute since
that date, and the explanation of the change over from a decrease to an
increase must be sought elsewhere. The main increases in ships of all types
have been, in the case of Great Britain and Ireland, 33,873 tons, in that of
Italy 196,449 tons, and in that of Norway 175,249 tons. On the other hand,
the tonnage of the United States has suffered a very considerable reduction,
amounting as it does to some 579,000 tons less than it was twelve months ago.
It is probable that the policy of scrapping inefficient tonnage has reached
its economic limit, and that the low price obtainable for vessels to be broken
up has resulted in a considerable tonnage being laid up by the owners in
preference to being scrapped. This supposition is to some extent borne out
by the fact that the most recent returns show a decided falling off in the
amount of tonnage withdrawn for breaking up. At the best, this factor can
only account for an absence of further reductions, and the increase remains
to be explained. If we confine our attention to the case of Great Britain
and Ireland, we find that the reduction in ships of all types was 175,711
tons for the year ending June, 1924, and, as stated, this has been converted
into an increase of 334,873 in the year just ended. In commenting on the
world's shipbuilding in our issue of January 23 last, we mentioned that there
was a great increase in tonnage launched in 1924 as compared with 1923,
due to improvements in the figures for British yards. We pointed out,
however, that much of the building had been undertaken at prices which
admitted of little or no profit, and that in some cases it had actually been
undertaken at a loss. The actual increase of the year's production was
604,570 tons, and a large proportion of this was to the order of British


  p. 1786 (#718)                      #

1786
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
firms. It would thus appear that shipowners have been in a position to
profit by the unusual economic conditions prevailing in the shipbuilding
yards, and in this way to strengthen their fleets by the addition of vessels of
the latest type. Considerable doubt may be felt about the economic soundness
of such a state of affairs from a national standpoint, but with this we are
not concerned at the moment. One of the results will certainly be to place
British shipowners in a favorable position to obtain their fair share of in-
creased trade, which may be looked forward to with some confidence in view
of the more hopeful prospects of a return to stability in central Europe.
This increase in the efficiency of the mercantile marine is not confined
to the British Isles, as is shown by the considerable increase which has
taken place generally in recent years in the number of sea-going steamers
and motorships of relatively large tonnage. Confining our attention to
vessels of both types of 4,000 tons or over, it is mentioned in the register
that there were 3,608 such vessels in 1914, whereas today the figure reaches
6,060. If these figures are further examined, is is found that of the latter
number, 356 are of 10,000 tons or over, while 36 are of 20,000 tons and up-
wards. It is satisfactory to note that of the 356 vessels of 10,000 tons
or over, no less than 211 are under the British flag. The group of vessels
which form the largest tonnage is that between 4,000 and 6.000 tons each.
This group totals 17,768,634 tons, equal to 28.5 per cent of the total steam
and motor tonnage of the world. It is interesting to note that the largest
liners, of 15,000 tons each and upwards, only represent some 3.4 per cent of
the total.
Considerable attention was devoted at the meeting of the Institution of
Naval Architects, held in London in April last, to the relative overall
efficiency of oil and steam-engined vessels, but as this subject was discussed
in our columns as recently as June 12 last, we do not propose to comment on
it here. As illustrating the growing size and commercial importance of
motorships, it may be noted that 264 are of 4,000 tons and upwards. Forty-
three of these are of 8,000 tons and upwards, the total tonnage of the latter
amounting to 441,520 tons. Dealing with the figures for the last twelve
months, the tonnage of motorships has increased by 738,000; of vessels
fitted with steam turbines by 305,000; while that of vessels fitted with re-
ciprocating steam engines has decreased by 152,000. Of the two alternative
types of transmission, a total tonnage of 440,000 is now fitted with a combina-
tion of steam turbines and reciprocating engines, while thirty-six vessels,
with a total tonnage of 110,000, are fitted with electric transmission, this
figure including both the steam turbine and Diesel engine as the prime mover.
Of the 3,490 steamers of 17,804,122 tons fitted for burning oil fuel, 730,
of 4,679,695 tons, are registered in Great Britain and Ireland, and 1,855, of
8,999,050 tons, are registered in the United States.
A table classifying all existing steamers and motorships according to age,
shows that there are 4,003 vessels less than five years old, their tonnage
representing just under 21 per cent of the total in existence. There is thus
a very large bulk of relatively inefficient tonnage still on the register,
and it is reasonable to suppose that a revival in trade would lead to a very
appreciable portion of this tonnage being scrapped, to the great advantage of
ship builders. Some of the statistics in relation to the older ships are of
considerable interest. Thus it appears that there are over 7,000 vessels of
twenty-five or more years old still in service, this figure including over
1,000,000 tons of wood and composite steamers. The general increase in
the size of tonnage to which we have referred is reflected in the fact that of
the vessels built in 1900 or before, nearly 65 per cent are of less than 1,000
tons each, the average size of the remainder being 2,705 tons; while of the
vessels built during the last five years, only about 33 per cent are of less
than 1,000 tons each, the average for the remainder reaching 4.708 tons. Of
a proportion of tonnage less than five years old, Germany has 50.6 per


  p. 1787 (#719)                      #

1925]
1787
Professional Notes
cent, Holland 33.5 per cent, France 27 per cent, Denmark 26.7 per cent,
and Great Britain and Ireland 25.5 per cent.
Merchant Ship Subsidy Systems
By Cary W. Cook, Chairman, American-Hawaiian Steampship Company,
The Nautical Gazette, 25 July, 1925.—The legitimate function of a ship is to
transport goods at a rate that will enable those who send the goods by
her to carry out their business at a profit. At the same time the ship must
be operated so efficiently and cheaply that whatever the goods pay in freight
money will be enough to cover the cost of operation and to set aside a certain
sum annually to be used in building another ship when she herself is past
her efficient life.
So far as there is any record, the business of shipowning has been done
by those who have found in that a better return than shore occupations
afforded. The high rank of Norway as a shipping nation is due to the
seafaring qualities of her people, to her geographic location, and to the
fact that because of her limited industrial development, merchant shipping
offers greater financial rewards and better opportunities for the employ-
ment of her people. The conditions in our New England States where
American shipping originated were very similar, but with the opening of the
West and almost unlimited opportunities on the land, we gave up our
shipping and left the carriage of our goods to those who were less for-
tunately situated and who were content with a smaller return. We were
not less patriotic than now. Shipping didn't pay. Those who took up our
shipping when we cast it aside have been continuously at it and neither
England, Norway, Sweden, nor Holland have ever paid, nor do they now
pay, any subsidy to cargo carriers and they are the leading maritime nations.
France has made frequent and costly experiments with various forms of
subsidies without accomplishing the results hoped for and is not considered
a maritime nation. Her subsidy systems have been used as models by Italy,
Austria, Hungary and Spain; none of these are considered maritime nations.
Japan in 1896 instituted a liberal subsidy policy under a law resembling
in many respects the subsidy laws of France. The fact that the merchant
marine of Japan has developed very rapidly since the institution of the sub-
sidy policy has been attributed by many to the liberal state aid which it has
received, but account should be taken of the fact that Japan has had a re-
markable industrial and commercial development during this period. Al-
though the principal Japanese steamship companies have been in receipt of
government aid since 1888 and have developed rapidly, their financial state-
ments for recent years show that they have not gotten beyond the need for
financial assistance from the state.
Those countries which have been driven by necessity to the sea and which
have relied upon individual enterprise and self-reliance rather than on
government bounty are today successful in shipping. Those countries which
do other things better and find them easier and which do not go to sea unless
guaranteed a profit by the state, hold an inferior maritime position. Bel-
gium, which has a very large overseas trade, has been content to have
most of this trade carried in foreign bottoms by those who could do it the
cheapest and put her in a position to compete. To promote the export of
agricultural products, Denmark for a number of years paid a substantial
subsidy to lines operating to England, but withdrew it under the fear of
retaliation.
It would seem that subsidizing cargo carriers would be in defiance of
demonstrated failures and must lead to commercial unfriendliness curtailing
our foreign trade. It may even lead to retaliation, affecting seriously our
industrial, cargo carriers. It is upon these industrial ships that we must
place our reliance for the foundation of an American merchant marine in


  p. 1788 (#720)                      #

1788
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the foreign trade. Our first shipowners were primarily merchants who
themselves furnished the cargoes or foundations for them and provided
space for the more or less small ventures of others. The lines or public
carriers were an outgrowth. The movement is being revived. The lumber
mills of this coast always had their own fleets of sailing ships. The oil
companies, owing to the nature of their cargoes, were forced to provide their
own tankers. The steel companies first of all chartered to bring ore from
abroad and have expanded into ownership and the transportation of their
finished product. Our most prominent automobile manufacturer is trying
out the plan of his own ships. The ownership of vessels by large industries
is capable of great expansion and will expand unless some of the lines tem-
porarily hurt by this competition should more insistently and definitely de-
mand regulation.
Even carefully considered regulation, together with full details worked
out in advance of any law providing for it, will surely impair the service to
the small shipper who must, without sufficient cargo at one time, depend
altogether on the line. Hasty, ill-considered regulatory legislation will,
until effective regulation of ships is found impossibe, nullify all the ad-
vantages otherwise to be had from water competition. Nations have gone to
war and will again go to war to gain access to the sea and all the natural
advantages growing out of such access and if we, with a coastline on
four seas, shall nullify that advantage by attempted regulation we will for-
feit our birthright and, instead of service born of free competition, will
descend to a self-satisfied mediocrity in the protected coastwise trade and
disappear from foreign waters.
The greatest danger to the industry from state aid is that such aid carries
with it government meddling. The man who puts up the money always wants
to know how it is being spent. Even mail subventions, which differ from
subsidies in that they require a definite service in return, carry with them
regulation and in some cases participation by the government.
The Austria Lloyd contract provides that three members of the board of
directors, including the chairman, shall be nominated by the government
and that all freight and passenger tariffs shall be submitted to the Minister
of Commerce for approval and that the government shall share in the net
earnings above 6 per cent, and so forth. The French Government contracts
give practically as much control. The Japanese lines give the government as
much control as it is possible to give over privately owned lines. The
tendency is strongly toward a division of profits above a fair return on the
investment and the requirements are very exacting. One government re-
quires that it be consulted in regard to arrangement of routes, ports of call,
number of voyages to be made and time of voyage.
It is true, and it is no wonder, that the White Star Line, which has
never received aid of any kind from the British Government and which has
been a competitor of the Cunard Line in the transatlantic trade, has been
far more successful as an earner of dividends than has its subsidized rival,
This is true also of the Anchor Line, the Leyland Line, and the Red Star
Line in the same trade.
Mail subventions are granted principally to insure close communication
between the mother countries and their colonies. We are not a colonizing
nation and our efforts along the line of subventions have been somewhat
spasmodic and lacked definite purpose. No one has cared to risk his
money to establish a costly line of steamers based on a subsidy or subven-
tion which might be withdrawn at the whim of the political party in power.
With a definite policy and mail contracts for a period long enough to
amortize the vessel, it is quite within the probabilities that private capital
would undertake fast mail and passenger lines on major routes.
The argument that we need for the national defense a merchant marine
in the foreign trade is open to question. There has been no publicly ex-


  p. 1789 (#721)                      #

1925]
1789
Professional Notes
pressed opinion from the Army and Navy upon it, and if it really is true,
it would seem an easy thing for those charged with the national defense,
to select from the left-overs of the late war such ships as are required
for purposes of defense only, and thereafter take care of them and put the
expense where it belongs rather than continue losses of a million dollars
a week of tax money, under the delusion that our attempt to create a
merchant marine by law is justified by the doctrine of national defense.
There are approximately nine million gross tons of American ships in the
American coastwise trade. These coasters gave a good account of them-
selves in the late war and the fleet is better now than then. The definite
policy of the United States reserving the coasting trade to its own vessels
will not only preserve and expand this fleet without aid or regulation but,
what is of more importance, preserve our shipyards, which have already
given evidence of an almost unbelievable power to meet emergencies anü
with removal of the absurd prohibition against transfer of the flag can un-
doubtedly build for foreign account.
There has been so much sentiment interwoven in all discussions of
shipping that the real functions of the ship have been lost sight of or
obscured by hampering the record with insistence that each petty annoyance
shall be cured by legislation. There is no serious artificial obstacle to an
American Merchant Marine. The impassable barrier is that other things
pay better and, whenever American ships become a necessity and, therefore,
profitable, American ships will be provided. There are laws now which pre-
vent progress. Chiefest of these are the Shipping Act of 1916 and the
Merchant Marine Act of 1920. A few of my shipowning friends and my-
self devoted much time, labor, and all the ability vouchsafed us by the
Almighty's endowment of brains, to revise these two laws. The result was
embodied in the Shipping Act of 1924, which is momentarily in seclusion
owing to the more ambitious program of the shipping associations, but
it is far from dead and provides the practical man's solution of an intensely
practical question. It will, I think, be seriously considered by the next
Congress. It conforms to this declaration of a National Merchant Marine
· Policy:
It is necessary for the national defense that the United States shall have
a merchant marine sufficient to carry all of its domestic commerce and serve
as a naval or military auxiliary in time of war or national emergency.
It is desirable for the national defense that the United States shall have
upon the major trade routes between United States ports and foreign ports
combination passenger and freight lines with vessels of sufficient speed
to enable them to effectively compete with foreign lines in the carriage of
the mails and to serve as troop transports in time of war. Such ships to
be compensated by liberal mail subventions. Any other form of aid, whether
in the form of cash subsidy, discriminating duties, free Canal tolls, or the
like, inevitably and invariably leads to a dependence on Federal paternalism
in a field where individual courage and independence are demanded, and
should not be granted.
It has been found by some of our large industries desirable to own their
own cargo vessels in the foreign trade and this should be encouraged.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the United States to encourage
the maintenance by private owners of such a merchant marine, assuring to
owners freedom from regulation or competition, direct or indirect, by the
government. It is recognized that to maintain and expand a merchant
marine the art of shipbuilding shall not be lost or impaired and that Ameri-
can shipyards must be encouraged to maintain themselves in a position to
again rapidly expand to meet any national emergency. To that end no ves-
sels except those wholly built and equipped ready for sea in American yards
shall be permitted to trade between ports of the United States except the
trade between United States ports and the Philippine Islands.


  p. 1790 (#722)                      #

1790
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Except in time of war or national emergency there shall be no restric-
tion upon :
Building for foreign owners.
Sale of American ships abroad.
Selling securities of shipowners or shipbuilders abroad as long as the
management through ownership of a majority of the capital stock of
building and owning corporations is in the hands of American citizens.
If, under laws passed or to be passed in furtherance of the above-
declared policy, American shipowners enter the foreign trade with purely
cargo vessels, they will be encouraged as far as consistent with the proper
growth of our foreign trade; but it must be recognized that ships alone do
not make foreign commerce and sentimantal regard for American ships in
the foreign trade must not interfere with the more important consideration
of placing the exporters of our surplus in position to cultivate the friend-
ship of foreign buyers, themselves shipowners, and to take advantage of as
low freight rates as our competitors enjoy through free competition of
foreign ships.
Ford's Bid for Scrap Ships Recommended for Acceptance
The Nautical Gazette, 25 July, 1925.—The Ford bid of $1,706,000 for the
200 Shipping Board vessels for scrap has been recommended by President
Palmer of the Fleet Corporation for acceptance. The suggestion in the Ford
Company's bid that there be substituted for some of the ships included in
the offer certain other vessels located north of the James River, was dis-
approved by Admiral Palmer on the ground that the government would
have to go to the expense of arranging for transportation of these sub-
stituted vessels, and, also, because of the possibility of other higher bids
having been tendered had these ships been included in the list as originally
advertised.
The automobile manufacturer's bid was the second highest proposal in
actual amount received as the Ocean Power Company, of Bar Harbor,
Maine, bid $2,244,000 for the 200 ships but no check accompanied the bid,
which was said to rule it out of consideration for failure to comply with
the terms of the advertisement requiring a deposit of 10 per cent of the
proposed purchase price with cach tender.
Formal protest against any action on the new bids by the Shipping Board
was filed by the Boston Iron and Metal Company, of Baltimore, on the
ground that, under the original advertisement for the sale of the ships, the
board should only negotiate with the original bidders; that the board should
not have made public the original bids unless it was going to accept or
reject them and that it was unfair and inequitable to make public prices of
the June 30 opening and then call for new bids. General Council Chauncey
Parker of the Shipping Board, however, has upheld the proceedings of the
board incident to the receipt of the Ford bid.
A summary of the bids opened July 16 follows:
The Ford Motor Company, of Detroit, $1,706,000 for the entire 200 ships
for scrapping.
A. V. Wilson, president, the Ocean Power Company, of Bar Harbor,
Maine, $2,244,000 for the entire 200 ships, but no check accompanied the bid.
The General Metals Supply Company, of San Francisco, three different
bids for 50 ships, at prices ranging from $4,287 each to $5,226 each for
complete scrapping and from $4,537 to $5,476 for partial scrapping; for
21 ships, from $3,800 to $5,027 for comlete scrapping and from $4,100
to $4,800 for partial scrapping; and for 40 ships, from $4,287 to $6,415 for
complete scrapping and from $4,537 to $6,815 for partial scrapping.


  p. 1791 (#723)                      #

1925)
1791
Professional Notes
The Newport News Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Comany, $808,100 for
139 ships.
The Hickman-Williams Company, of Philadelphia, $92,860 or $7,905 for
each of twelve ships.
August A. Weber and Dan Robins, of Buffalo, $650,000 for the entire
200 ships for scrapping.
The Newport News Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company, $808,100 for
130 ships.
The Hickman-Williams Company, of Philadelphia, $94,860 or $7,905 for
cach of 12 ships.
N. Block and Company, of Norfolk, Virginia, for 25 ships at prices
ranging from $4,030 to $4,777 each.
A. Douglas Gibson, of Washington, on behalf of J. T. Knight and Son,
of Columbus, Georgia, $5,500 each for 29 ships.
The Sun Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company, of Chester, Pennsylvania,
$6,800 for five ships and $5,800 for five ships for complete scrapping or
$29,000 for the ten ships for partial scrapping
B. R. Stafford, of New York, $20,000 for two ships for operation, re-
submitted.
Hart Enterprise Electric Company, of New Orleans, $3,695 each for two
ships, resubmitted, no check.
American Ship Wrecking Corporation, $2,000 each for three ships, re-
submitted.
In addition an offer was made by Frank Harrisons Company, of Chicago,
to scrap the 200 ships, guaranteeing the government a minimum of $1,250.000
from the sale of the scrap and 50 per cent of the money realized from
the scrap above that amount.
The Ford Company agrees to scrap the ships within the continental
limits of the United States within eighteen months of delivery of the ves-
sels, agrees that none of the machinery shall be put onto the market, but
reserves the right to use of any of the machinery from the ships in its
own factories and plants.
The Ford Company reserved the right to Dieselize any of the ships of
design number 1023 which are included in the 200 for salt water navigation.
There are 50 of these vessels, which are oil-burners and range from 5,070
to 5,340 deadweight tons. Of the 50 there are 19 located at New York,
19 in the James River, and 12 at Philadelphia.
Scrapping Shipping Board Ships
The Nautical Gazette, i August, 1925.—Another statement equally mis-
leading is attributed in the press to Senator Duncan U. Fletcher. of Florida.
Senator Fletcher takes occasion to discuss the Shipping Board's action in
the matter of the sale of two hundred ships for scrap and to inject some
severe criticisms of the board's decision. He takes the view that the
board is without power, under the law, to scrap ships unless they are unfit
for sea service. Somebody has told Senator Fletcher that the two hundred
ships offered for sale for scrap are not unfit for service, that they are being
well preserved at low cost, and that they could be placed in commission
on short notice at slight expense. The Senator goes on to state that it is
costing $750 a year to maintain the ships, and that they will be as good
ten or fifteen years from now as they are today. All of this is contrary to
the real facts. A survey by experts of the Shipping Board's fleet last
year revealed that there were 521 ships which would never be of any
commercial value, therefore, 200 can easily be scrapped and still leave
margin in the event that any additional ships above those now in service and
those being held as a first and second reserve should be required. Figures
of the Fleet Corporation show that the total cost of caring for the laid-up


  p. 1792 (#724)                      #

1792
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
fleets is $2,700,000 per year, or an average of $3,000 per ship, which is a long
way from Senator Fletcher's estimate of $750 per ship. To say that the
vessels will be as good ten or fifteen years from now is tantamount to an
admission of ignorance of ships. It is true that the vessels may be in
almost as good a physical condition as they are today, but in comparison
with the merchant vessels of ten or fifteen years hence they will be hope-
lessly obsolete. Marine engineering and naval architecture are not sta-
tionary arts; they are progressive, and with the rapid development of direct
Diesel and Diesel-electric driven ships the vessel of today which is con-
sidered suitable only for scrap will be completely outclassed fifteen years
from now, and will be out of the running in competition with modern ships
of other nations. Above all things, the American merchant marine must be
kept up to date if it is to compete successfully for world trade, and the re-
tention of ships that are only fit for scrap is an obstacle in the way of that
essential modernization.
MISCELLANEOUS
Submarine Cruisers
Engineering, 17 July, 1925.—At the meetings of the Association Tech-
nique Maritime et Aëronautique, held in Paris in May, a paper, entitled
"Submarine Cruisers," was presented by M. de Vito, the director of Naval
Construction of the Ansaldo Works, at Genoa. In his introductory re-
marks, the author stated that although from 1900 to 1914 the submarine was
in process of development in most navies, yet so far as its tactical and
strategical employment was concerned, it had not passed the experimental
stage. The vast majority of naval officers had little confidence in the type,
and only a few of the most thoughtful and progressive predicted a future
for it, and visualized some of its functions in a naval conflict. It was not
until September 23, 1914, that the faith of the few was fully justified,
and the responsible naval authorities were convinced of the important part
the submarine was likely to take in the world war. On this date, the Ger-
man submarine U-9 sank three cruisers of the Cressy class, and 1,500
officers and men lost their lives. From that date, the submarine proved itself
a most effective and dangerous weapon of war, and at times threatened to
jeopardize the cause of the Allies. M. de Vito expresses the opinion that
but for the continuous and increasing pressure of the Allies on land, and
the consequent break up of the enemy armies, the submarine would have
forced a victory for the Central Powers.
In August, 1914, one single type of submarine was afloat. Its armament
was the torpedo and its purpose the attack of enemy surface warships. As
the war progressed and the nature and magnitude of its naval problems be-
came more clearly defined, other types of submarines were developed and
purposes of which were as diverse as those of surface warships. The
gun and the mine were added to the torpedo in the armament of under-
water craft, and as experience was gained, the caliber of the former and the
number of mines which could be carried were both increased. At the
Armistice, in addition to the much improved type in existence at the out-
break of war, there were several others; the monitor submarine, the de-
stroyer, the mine-layer, fleet and cruiser submarines. One of the most
difficult post-war problems of the naval staffs of the powers was to de-
termine which of the types should be developed for future use and which
abandoned. The problem varied with the naval policy of the nation con-
cerned, and the decisions reached may be interpreted by the types which are
building and projected. In August, 1914, only a few expert officers possessed
the necessary knowledge to discuss such questions; now they must be de-
bated and determined by a far larger circle. For this reason, says M. de
Vito, submarine technique must be popularized, so that ideas on the subject


  p. 1793 (#725)                      #

1925)
1793
Professional Notes
shall be as clear as those for ordinary surface warships. His paper has
been written with that object in view.
The author next reviews the powers and weights of Diesel engines which
are suitable for the surface propulsion of submarines, and remarks in
passing that, as with surface ships, the dimensions and speeds of submarines
have increased with the power of the engine. He states that the most power-
ful engines of the submarine type yet constructed are the 3,000 h.p. Nurn-
burg, the 3,500 h.p. Sulzer and the 3,000 h.p. Tosi, but considers it is now
practicable to build an engine to develop 6,000 h.p. and mentions a report
that the Sulzer Company are constructing one of 7,000 brake horsepower.
The weights of submarine engines, with shafts, propellers and other neces-
sary gear, vary from 88 lb. to 99 lb. per horsepower, figures which compare
with 44 lb. for the propelling installations of light cruisers, 33 lb. for flotilla
leaders, 26 lb. for destroyers, 11 lb. for motorboats, and 2} lb, for aeroplane
engines. This comparison shows the submarine Diesel engine to be very
heavy, but it is not greatly different in this respect from those for merchant
ships or earlier cruisers. The fuel economy of the Diesel engine is neglected
in this comparison, although of importance from other points of view.
For submerged propulsion, the weight of the main motors and the bat-
teries from which they draw their power, is 220 lb. to 264 lb. per horsepower
developed normally. The distribution of the total weight or surface dis-
placement of a modern submarine is stated to be as follows: Hull structure,
fittings and fixed ballast, 58 per cent; crew with their effects, provisions
and fresh water, 2 per cent; armament, i.e., torpedoes and tubes, guns, and
charges, and so forth, 5 per cent; and fuel and lubricating oils 5 per cent.
The remaining 30 per cent of the surface displacement is represented by
the weight of the surface and submerged propelling installations.
Using the foregoing figures as a basis, and taking 25 h.p. to the ton for
surface and 10 h.p. for submerged propulsion, the author considers two
extreme cases. In the first, the 30 per cent of the surface displacement is
used for a submarine Diesel installation, and in the second it is entirely
utilized for motors and batteries for submerged propulsion. The two cases
are designated A and D, and assuming various surface displacements, the
resulting speeds are determined. The tables given above show the results.
From these figures, it is concluded that, in the present stage of Diesel
engine design, is is impracticable to obtain more than 25 knots, even when
submerged navigation is entirely sacrificed.
In calculating these speeds, the submerged displacement is taken as 25
per cent greater than the surface. The results show that submerged speed
is very costly, an increase in 1,000 tons of surface displacement being
necessary to obtain half a knot extra speed for the largest vessels. It is
concluded that 14 knots is the practical limit to submerged speed. In gen-
eral a maximum of 10 to 11 knots is specified for the ordinary types of
submarines.
Two further cases are next considered, these being more nearly in ac-
cordance with actual practice. The first, B, assumes that the power sub-
merged is one-half that on the surface, and the second, C, that the two are
equal. In both, the weights of the submerged and surface power installa-
tions are together taken as 30 per cent of the surface displacement.
A comparison of the speeds in the two tables shows that for submarines
above 1,200 tons displacement the surface speed is reduced by 21/2 knots to
obtain an increase of i knot of submerged speed.
The paper then proceeds to quote examples of actual submarines to illus-
trate the results obtained in the four tables. The first example is the British
R class, which are described as submarine destroyers, having been designed
with high submerged speed for rapidly approaching and destroying sub-
marines sighted on the surface. The published particulars of this class give


  p. 1794 (#726)                      #

1794
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
CASE A.-INTERNAL-COMBUSTION ENGINES ONLY
2,000
Surface displacement......... tons
Weight of power plant....
inverno
Approximate horsepower ...B.H.P.
Number of shafts.....
Maximum speed............knots |
500
150
3,750
1,500
450
1,000
300
7,500
2,500
750
18,750
600
15,000
3,000
900
22,500
11,250
3,500
1,050
26,250
4
25.8
4
20.8
22:5
23.4
24:3
24.9
25.4
CASE B.-POWER OF MOTORS EQUAL TO ONE-HALF OF THE DIESEL ENGINES
Surface displacemet. tons
Power on surface. . H.P.
Power submerged.. ”
Speed on surface. . knots
Speed submerged..
500
1,600
800
15.5
8.7
800
2,600
1,300
16.6
9.2
1,200
4,000
2,000
17.5
9:7
1,500
5,000
2,500
17.9
9.9
2,000
6,600
3,300
18:5
10.2
2,500
8,200
4,100
18.9
10.5
3,000
10,000
5,000
19.3
10.7
3,500 | 4,000
11,600 13,200
| 5,800 6,600
19.6 119.9
10.9 11:1
CASE C.-POWER OF MOTORS EQUAL TO THAT OF THE DIESEL ENGINES
800
700
| 1,200
2,600
1,500
3,200
2,000
4,300
2,500
5,400
3,000
6,500
3,500
7,500
4,000
8,600
Surface displacement.tons 500
Power on surface...h.p. 1,100
Power submerged..
Speed on surface. . knots 13.6
Speed submerged
9.6
14.3
10:1
15.1
10.5
15.4
17.0
16:0
11.1
16.4
11.5
16.7
11.7
17.3
12:1
10.8
11.9
CASE D.-ELECTRIC MOTORS AND BATTERIES ONLY
... ton
S
Surface displacement...
Weight of power plant (electric)..
Power of motors..
Submerged speed.
500
150
1,500
10.8
1,000
300
3,000
11.5
horsepower
......knots
2,000
600
6,000
12:5
3,000
900
9,000
13
4,000
1,200
12,000
13.5
5,000
1,500
15,000
13.9


  p. 1795 (#727)                      #

1925]
1795
Professional Notes
the surface displacement as 420 tons, surface power 240 h.p., submerged
power 1,200 h.p., surface speed 9/2 knots, and submerged speed 15 knots.
This type falls between cases C and D, being nearer the latter. According
to the table for case D, the maximum submerged speed for 420 tons surface
displacement should be about 107/2 knots. The author considers the reputed
speed of 15 knots to be impracticable, and that twice the power stated would
be required for such a speed. He states that 15 knots has never been ob-
tained. The difference between 10/2 and 15 knots is a large one to explain,
but probably a more efficient form than that assumed for the tables was
adopted by the British authorities. The paper states that the type has been
abandoned by the British Admiralty, but it is to be noted that two of the
class are mentioned as being in commission in the published official lists
of ships.
Submarine minelayers are next referred to, this type also falling between
cases C and D, but being nearer to the former. The 5 per cent for arma-
ment of the modern submarine is greatly exceeded in this type by the
weight and number of the mines, and this has the effect of reducing the
30 per cent for propelling installations to 25 and even 20 per cent. The
speeds, surface and submerged, are therefore smaller than are shown in
Table C. The following particulars of German minelaying submarines are
quoted:
Displacements
Tons
Powers
H.P.
Speeds
Knots
417
500
11.4
U.C. 16-79...
493
7.4
600
11.5
»
90-105...
620
10.5
»
74-80....
883
Between Cases B and C fall all submarines of the coastal or defensive
type which have been constructed, and particularly those of from 500 to
600 tons with 14 or 15 knots surface and 8 or 9 knots submerged speed.
This type is considered to have a great future, as it can be economically
constructed in large numbers. The new French Ariane class of 600 tons
surface and 765 tons submerged displacement, 1,300 h.p. surface and 1,000
h.p. submerged giving speeds of 14 and 9.5 knots, are quoted as examples.
In Class B is placed the ordinary submarine for offensive action—the
type afloat in August, 1914-having a displacement of 800 to 900 tons with
speeds of 16 and 9 knots surface and submerged. The French vessels of
the Requin class, now under construction, are the latest examples of this
type. Their displacements are 1,150 and 1,410 tons, horsepowers 2,900 and
1,800, and speeds 16 and 10 knots.
Between A and B comes the submarine cruiser, of which the German
U 142 class is stated to be the prototype. These were of 2,200 tons surface
displacement, engine of 6,000 h.p., and motors of 2,600 h.p. with corre-
sponding speeds of 17.8 and 8.5 knots, thus falling nearer to B than A. The
British XI, of 2,800 tons, is also placed in this category, and it is deduced
from the tables that, with this displacement and if fitted with Diesel engines,


  p. 1796 (#728)                      #

1796
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the surface speed cannot exceed 21 or 22 knots. If the vessel falls exactly
under Class B the surface speed should be 19 knots and the horsepower
about 9,300. The projected V engeur class of 2,400 tons surface displace-
ment and 3,000 tons submerged, with speeds of 18 and i knots, is also
quoted as an example, and it is stated that, for the surface power plant of
these submarines, the French authorities are experimenting with light Diesel
engines to develop from 5,000 to 7,000 h.p.
M. de Vito next considers submarine cruisers at some length, and outlines
the general particulars of a design which the firm of Ansaldo has prepared.
He states that the number of guns to be mounted must be four at least, but
six or eight are preferable. With a limitation of 3,000 tons surface dis-
placement, 6-in. guns can be mounted, whereas for 8-in. guns the displace-
ment would reach 8,000 tons, an increase in size over present submarines
which no naval authorities would attempt. For such a displacement, four
shafts, each with an engine of 6,000 h.p., would give 21 knots.
In the preliminary design for a 3,000-ton vessel, Messrs. Ansaldo have
allowed for six 6-in. guns mounted in two triple turrets, these being entered
from the conning tower, whereas, according to M. de Vito, the two turrets
in the British XI are isolated from the tower. A secondary armament of
four 4-in, anti-aircraft guns in twin mountings is also arranged for in the
Italian design. These are installed on the superstructure above the triple
turrets. Four torpedo tubes at the bow and four at the stern are proposed,
making the total armament weights 450 tons, or 15 per cent of the surface
displacement. This largely increased percentage over the 5 per cent quoted
for the ordinary submarine necessitates economy in other directions.
Considering next the submerged speed and the power required to main-
tain it, the author argues that, since economy in weight is required to allow
for the heavier armament, a submerged speed of 4 or 5 knots with sufficient
battery endurance to maintain the speed during daylight, i.e., for 15 hours,
is all that is necessary. A radius of action of 60 miles at 4 knots is allowed
for in the design, necessitating a weight of motors and batteries of 240
tons, or 8 per cent of the displacement. The two motors, each of 1,000 h.p.,
are capable of an overload for a short time and weigh 20 tons each. The
maximum submerged speed that can be maintained for one hour is 742
knots, but if this were increased to 10 knots the weights would be augmented
by 110 tons to 160 tons.
The maximum surface speed of the design is 21 knots, and to attain this
speed two engines, each of 6,000 brake horsepower, are proposed. These
would be single-acting, four-cycle, six-cylinder engines of 25.6 in. stroke
and diameter and 330 r.p.m., each engine weighing 130 tons. The 3,000 h.p.
M.A.N. engine weighs 70 tons, and on this basis the estimate appears rea-
sonable. For the complete engine installation, 400 tons is the weight esti-
mated to be necessary. This gives 30 h.p. per ton, as compared with the
25 h.p. used in preparing the four tables, an indication of the greater econ-
omy in weight of the more powerful engines. The total weight of the two
propelling installations-surface and submerged—is thus 640 tons, or 21
per cent of the displacement. At a cruising speed of 10 knots, the designers
estimate the consumption of oil fuel to be about 60 lb, per nautical mile.
The total fuel allowed is 190 tons, giving a radius of action of 7,000 miles
at 10 knots. To this weight is added thirty tons of lubricating oil, giving
a total of 220 tons, or 7 per cent of the submerged displacement.
The officers and men for the cruiser submarine are estimated to number
100, their weight with provisions and water being taken as 55 tons to 60
tons, or 2 per cent of the displacement.
The total percentage already allocated reaches 45.5, leaving for the hull,
fittings and ballast 54.5 per cent, as compared with the 58 per cent quoted
for the ordinary submarine. The weight of accessories, auxiliary mechan-


  p. 1797 (#729)                      #

1925]
1797
Professional Notes
isms, anchors, cables, and equipment is stated to vary from 14 per cent to
15 per cent of the surface displacement for a large submarine, leaving 40
per cent for the hull structure and fixed ballast.
The author then discusses the various schemes which have been adopted
for the provision of the ballast, fuel, and other necessary tanks, quoting
figures to illustrate his arguments. He arrives at the conclusion that the
main ballast and oil-fuel tanks are most economically fitted outside the
pressure hull, i.e., between the pressure and external hulls, the method now
usually adopted. Certain tanks, such as compensating and trimming tanks,
which are relatively small, are more satisfactorily placed inside the pressure
hull. The thickness of the latter and the scantlings of its framing must
depend on the maximum depth to which it is intended the submarine should
submerge. In the earliest submarines, this depth was 30 m, and in 1914 had
increased to 45 m, while during the war 80 m to 100 m were employed. In
the submarine cruiser design 100 m has been allowed for, and for such a
depth the weight of the pressure-hull plating and framing is about 440 lb.
to 484 lb. per cubic metre of displacement. This amounts to about 20 per
cent of the surface displacement, to which must be added 5 per cent for
bulkheads, decks, and so forth. Finally, the structure of the submarine is
stated to require from 34 per cent to 36 per cent of the surface displace-
ment, which, deducted from the 40 per cent previously arrived at, leaves
4 per cent to 6 per cent for fixed ballast.
The paper next refers to the difficult question of stability, and mentions
that in the single-hull submarine of circular section, the stability, when sub-
merged, was satisfactory, while on the surface it was small and ballast had
to be added to secure an adequate amount. In the double-hull type, the
conditions are reversed, the stability on the surface being ample, while to
insure a satisfactory state when submerged, from 6 to 7 per cent of the
displacement is required for a ballast keel. The problem of securing stability
during the process of submerging, when the ballast tanks are only partially
full, is stated to be a difficult one, more especially in a double-hull sub-
marine. The unsatisfactory stability of German submarines, and the meas-
ures taken to remedy this are also referred to.
Some proposals have been advanced lately by which the stability of sub-
marines can be secured, the ballast keel reduced, and the weight thereby
saved applied to the improvement of other qualities. Three of these pro-
posals are referred to in the paper. The first is that of Professor Flamm,
who replaces the completely circular sectioned pressure hull by a trilobular
one and claims for this a smaller weight of pressure hull and framing for
the same depth of submergence, and also an improved stability. Both of
these results permit of an economy in weight, which he proposes to allocate
to armor and guns. M. de Vito states that his predecessor at the Ansaldo
Works, Colonel Soliani, has studied the problem, and has patented a section
of pressure hull with two circular lobes by which the same results are ob-
tained as for the trilobular, but which permits of much simpler internal
arrangements. The third proposal is that of Captain de Feo, of the Royal
Italian Navy, who retains the circular pressure hull, but arranges his ballast
and fuel tanks before and abaft it, instead of laterally as in the usual design.
This is the type submarine, a description of which has appeared in
Engineering, on page 171 of Vol. CXVIII. With this design economy in
hull structure is obtained, and the stability both when submerging and sub-
merged is satisfactory. M. de Vito inclines to the opinion that such a
system with some modifications will be found useful for adoption in cruiser
submarines. With it, however, the surface stability is not as satisfactory
as in the ordinary type, and it may be found necessary to add ballast or
fit bulges at the waterline to remedy this defect.


  p. 1798 (#730)                      #

1798
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
In concluding the paper, M. de Vito states that submarine experts have
always opposed large submarines, and he surmises that they appreciate the
difficulties more clearly than others with less experience, and prefer to
advance by reasonable steps to larger dimensions. Before the war, Italian
experts considered 700 tons as the maximum limit of displacement, and
this opinion was shared in other countries. During the war, however, sub-
marines of over 2,000 tons were constructed and operated successfully, indi-
cating that the difficulties were less than had been anticipated. He considers
that to the defensive, offensive and mine-layer types it is necessary to add
the submarine cruiser, and although he recognizes the time has not yet
arrived, presumably for lack of the powerful engines required, it will not
be long before the type is built. He believes a solution will be found by
reducing the submerged power installation to a minimum.
The author has successfully accomplished the object he had in view when
writing the paper. For various reasons information on submarines is far
more limited than for ordinary warships, and the data given in the paper
will indicate to the non-expert some of the difficulties of submarine design.
The naval officer will appreciate the effect of modification of qualities, espe-
cially surface and submerged speeds, on the displacement, while the expert
will find matter for study and criticism in the details of the cruiser design.
Two important considerations have not been mentioned in the paper. The
first of these is the cost of such vessels, and the second the tactical and
strategical purposes for which they are intended. In this country the cost
of a 3,000-ton submarine would be at least a million pounds, for which
three or four submarines of the offensive type of from 1,000 or 1,200 tons
could be constructed. The determination of the type to be built is the duty
of the higher naval authorities, but unless the cruiser type possesses very
great advantages over the equivalent larger number of the smaller and
offensive type, it is difficult to find a satisfactory reason for building it.
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
“The Hawaiian Maneuvers,” by Brigadier General Richmond P. Davis,
U.S.A. Coast Artillery Journal, July.
“Hydro-Electric Development at Muscle Shoals." The Engineer, July 3,
et seq.
"Meteorology, An Aid in Warfare,” The Military Engineer, July-August.
"The World's Largest Diesel Electric Ships," (M.S. J. W. Van Dyke),
Nautical Gazette, July 4.
“Liner Tonnage in Overseas Trade," Nautical Gazette, July 24 and
August 1.
"Application of Turbine to European Inland Waterway Navigation," (De-
scription of Turbine Paddle Wheel Tug 245 ft. long, 31 ft. beam, 4!2 it.
draft.) The Marine Engineer and Motorship Builder, July.
"Turbine Blade Corrosion Prevented by Eliminating Oxygen," (Abstract
of Paper Read before American Chemical Society). Power, July 21.
"The Problem of the Tank.” The Journal of the Royal Artillery, July.


  p. 1799 (#731)                      #

NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
FROM 7 JULY TO 7 AUGUST
PREPARED BY PROFESSOR ALLEN WESTCOTT, U. S. NAVAL
DEMY
EUROPEAN SECURITY NEGOTIATIONS
GERMAN REPLY Favorable.—Germany's reply to the French observa-
tions on Germany's offer of a security pact was handed to M. Briand,
French Minister of Foreign Affairs, on July 20. Germany's latest reply
again raised objections to the military obligations that would be incurred
by Germany's joining the league, and expressed objection also to the
proposal that France should act as guarantor for the treaties to be negotiated
between Germany and her eastern neighbors.
The note proceeds to deal with "the serious consequences," which might
arise from the form of the French proposals for the guarantee of the
treaties of arbitration. Pointing out the absolute power which it is proposed
to give the guarantor, the note says:
"This would mean that, should a conflict arise, it would be for the
guarantor to decide which of the two contracting parties to a treaty of ar-
bitration should be considered the aggressor, and he would have the right
to decide, even if he were bound to one of the contracting parties by a
special alliance. It is quite clear that the system of guarantees would
by such construction be invalidated, to the sole detriment of Germany. Real
pacification, as aimed at by the German Government, in concert with the
Allied governments, would not be reached
In the way of general remarks the note says: “In spite of the doubt and
apprehensions here indicated, the German Government is able to observe
that on essential points a significant rapprochment of views by the two sides
already has taken place. The interested governments are in principle
unanimous in their desire to settle the security problem on the lines Ger-
many has suggested and by further development of the system of arbitration
treaties."
Expressing the conviction that these difficulties can be overcome, the note
concludes:
"The German Government would heartily welcome acceleration of these
discussions so that the urgent desire of the nations for reliable guarantees
of peace and peaceful development, as well as for the restoration of the
world's normal economic relations destroyed by the war, soon may be
satisfied."
Press reports indicated a difference of position between France and
Great Britain on the arbitration features of the proposed agreement.
France desired that arbitration should be obligatory, and that the treaties
between Germany on the one hand and Poland and Czecho-Slovakia on
the other should have a guarantor; whereas the British Government ap-


  p. 1800 (#732)                      #

1800
[Sept.
U. Ș. Naval Institute Proceedings
peared inclined to put Germany on an equal footing and consider her
word as good as that of the Allies. A consultation of British and French
ministers was planned before M. Briand made his reply.
SKILL OF GERMAN NOTE.-- (By Robert Dell in Baltimore Sun of July 23).
Rarely has the Quai d'Orsay been presented with a document so difficult
to answer. It is now France that is in danger of appearing as an obstacle
to peace and to the conclusion of the proposed security pact.
Two passages in the German reply are particularly effective. One refers
to the proposed French guarantee of arbitration treaties between Germany
on the one hand and Poland and Czecho-Slovakia on the other. The
skillful way in which the reply makes clear that France, in fact, proposes
to act as Foreign Minister Stresemann has previously said privately, as
second and umpire at the same time puts the French Government in a
very difficult position.
Equally effective is the German argument relative to Article XVI of the
League of Nation's covenant, with its telling allusion to the fact that, ac-
cording to the Treaty of Versailles, German disarmament is to be only the
prelude to general disarmament. It is quite natural that Germany should
ask for exceptional treatment as a member of the league in regard to Ar-
ticle XVI so long as she is in her present exceptional position.
Switzerland has, in fact, already been granted exceptional treatment in
this respect because she is a neutral country.
The German reply spikes the French objection, that all members of the
league must have equal rights and duties, by showing that Germany will
not have equal rights until her disarmament is followed by general dis-
armament.
DEBT NEGOTIATIONS
BELGIAN Mission to UNITED STATES.—The Belgian Debt Commission,
consisting of Former Premier Theunis, the American Ambassador Baron
de Cartier, and two leading Belgian bankers, arrived in New York on
August 5. Negotiations were scheduled to begin shortly thereafter, and a
speedy solution was anticipated. In a speech in the Belgian Parliament on
July 15, Paul Hymans, Belgian Foreign Minister at the time of the Versailles
Treaty, presented the view that the United States was under special moral
obligations in regard to the Belgian debt, in view of the fact that Belgium
had signed the Versailles Treaty only upon express assurance of priority of
payments from Germany to Belgium and concessions regarding payment of
Belgium's debts to the Allies; and that although the Versailles Treaty was
not ratified by the United States Senate, President Wilson's signature in a
measure committed the American Government. This view was not accepted
by Washington officials.
The Italian negotiations with the American Debt Commission were fur-
ther postponed by the departure of Ambassador de Martino for Italy early
in August
It was reported on July 30 that French debt negotiations in London had
broken down, owing to the unwillingness of Great Britain to accept the
French offer of annual payments of £4,000,000 plus £6,000,000 in German
marks to be transferred from France's share of payments from Germany.


  p. 1801 (#733)                      #

1925]
1801
.
Notes on International Affairs
Negotiations were postponed indefinitely, until after French negotiations
with the United States.
.
FRANCE
FRENCH SUCCESS IN MOROCCO.- Following the appointment of General
Naulin as director of military operations in Morocco, under Marshal Lyautey
as Minister of War to the Sultan and French Resident in Morocco, French
forces began offensive operations with apparently general success.
On July 9 further agreements were signed between France and Spain,
providing for a land blockade to supplement the joint naval blockade of
Riff territory, and providing also for coordination of aims in the prosecu-
tion of the war, determination of political boundaries and zones of interest,
and an agreement not to conclude a separate peace. Thus, even in the event
of complete victory over the Riffs, there will remain the problems involved
in Spanish control in Morocco and incapacity to subdue the subject popula-
tion.
Peace terms were offered to Abd-el-Krim and were published in the
London Times, but these were so difficult of acceptance as to support the
view that they were put forward by the French Government merely to se-
cure Socialist acquiescence for the credits needed to carry on the war.
In the middle of July the Chamber voted a credit of 183,000,000 francs
(about $9,000,000), the Socialists not voting and the Communists forming
the opposition.
NEAR EAST
GREEK-Bulgarian TENSION.—(From Baltimore Sun of August 5).
Paris, August 4 (AP).-Greek troops were on their way to the Greeco-
Bulgarian frontier today, having been dispatched by the Greek Government
following the recent assassination of M. Nicolaides, a Greek citizen, at
Stanimaka, Bulgaria, and allegations by Greece of terroristic acts by Bul-
garians against Greeks along the border line.
Word has reached here from Athens that the government has pointed
out the possibility of seizing Bulgarian frontier towns in retaliation for the
killing of M. Nicolaides unless suitable reparation is made. While one
report from the Greek capital is that the Bulgarian reception of the demand
for reparation has not been favorable, a dispatch from Sofia, the Bulgarian
capital, says that in reply to the Greek communication, Foreign Minister
Kalfoff has expressed extreme regret over the assassination and promised
that all measures would be taken to punish the offenders.
M. Dendramis, Greek delegate to the League of Nations and Greek
Minister to Switzerland, is reported in a dispatch from Geneva as saying
that if the reply to the note sent from Athens to Sofia is not considered
satisfactory by Greece, an appeal would be taken to the League of Nations.
Under the voluntary agreement for the exchange of populations between
the two Governments, M. Dendramis explained, about 6,000 Greek residents
in Bulgaria were scheduled to depart for their homeland by mid-October.
In Greece, he said, the recent murders were looked upon as designed to ter-
rorize the Greeks into leaving in haste, thus affording an opportunity for the
confiscation of their property.


  p. 1802 (#734)                      #

1802
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
LATIN AMERICA
Latin AMERICA AND THE LEAGUE OF NATIONS.—(From Baltimore Sun
of July 27).
Williamstown, Massachusetts, July 27 (AP).-The assertion that a
growing trend toward a balance of power in the Latin-American countries
must be combated by the United States to avoid the same disastrous con-
sequences which resulted from the European balance of power was made
here today by Dr. Leo S. Rowe, director general of the Pan-American
Union, at Washington.
Stating that the tremendous and rapidly increasing volume of investments
by this country in the Latin-American countries is creating a fear there
of coming political domination, and citing the fact that the League of
Nations has developed in the Latin-American republics a much greater
consciousness of individuality and power, Dr. Rowe said:
"In view of the probable developments in the next twenty-five or fifty
years there could be nothing worse than this country's policy of isolation
from Europe on one hand and from Latin-America on the other, by reason
of the latter's affiliation with the league.
"Such a policy would be disastrous to our domestic development and would
place us on the defensive as a nation. Therefore, we have a very deep in-
terest in fostering an American system in which we shall form a part and
in which we shall be integrated as the Latin-American countries are inte-
grated.”
Discussing remedies for the situation by closer cooperation among all
the Americas, Dr. Rowe said:
"The formation of intellectual and cultural ties between this country and
the other American nations is a patriotic duty and we must not lull our-
selves to sleep with the thought that commercial bonds are sufficient. It is
essential, also, that Great Britain, with her possessions in this hemisphere,
be given a voice in the determination of Pan-American policies.
"The United States must make the Monroe Doctrine a continental doc-
trine, arousing the confidence of the Latin-American countries instead of
their distrust as at present."
This distrust was clearly shown, he asserted, "by the fact that disputes
between Latin-American republics have been submitted to the League of
Nations, which has superseded the action of the United States in securing
their settlement."
“When seventeen of the twenty Latin-American states were admitted to
the league," he went on, "it looked as if the discussion of American ques-
tions would be shifted from Washington to Geneva. There is a growing
feeling that the league may serve the countries to the south of us as a
counterweight to the influence of the United States.
"The fact of the overwhelming power of the United States, the fact that
from a military, naval, commercial and national viewpoint our power out-
weighs that of all the Latin-American countries combined is alone enough to
create a constant questioning as to what the United States is going to
do next.
"We are beginning to realize, however," he said, "that insofar as we
can develop a unity of purpose and of policy with these countries, our in-
fluence in world affairs will be correspondingly strengthened."
U. S. MARINES LEAVE NICARAGUA.—The 150 marines remaining in Nica-
ragua out of the company that Captain (now General) Smedley Butler
took there in 1912 will embark tomorrow for their journey back to the
United States, it was announced at the Navy Department today. They will
arrive at Hampton Roads on August 17 and from there will go to the
East Coast expeditionary base at Quantico, Virginia.


  p. 1803 (#735)                      #

1925)
1803
Notes on International Affairs
The marines were sent to Nicaragua under the command of Butler to
quiet the reign of terror that brought to a close the sixteen years' rule
of Dictator Jose Santos Zelaya and continued after he left office. At the
time it was announced that they would be kept there so long as the interests
and lives of foreigners were in danger.
The "lost battalion," as the marines were designated by the natives,
stayed through the administration of half a dozen presidents. Several
times former Secretary of State Hughes made moves to withdraw them,
but each time the party in power, representing the anti-Liberal element,
urged that they be retained. All the while, though, the opposition to the
party in power fought against the American supervision.
This year, when the Liberals got into power with a platform of “Nica-
ragua for Nicaraguans," it might have been expected that the new Presi-
dent, Carlos Solorzano, would wish a speedy departure of Uncle Sam's
troops—but he did not. Solorzano requested an extension of their stay and
it was agreed last winter that the marines would remain until not later
than September i to drill a native constabulary to take their place in main-
taining law and order.
Since the marines went to Nicaragua the gold standard has been estab-
lished, the monetary system has been reformed on the basis of the dollar
and a financial organization has been built up by a committee of Americans
and natives. The customs tariff was revised, the railroad was placed on a
dividend paying basis and the public debt was studied and liquidated to the
satisfaction of all, it is said, with the exception of about 3 per cent of the
creditors.
FAR EAST
Russo-JAPANESE RIVALRY IN MANCHURIA.—(From The Struggle in
Manchuria, by Philip Kerby, reprinted in Living Age from Japan Ad-
vertiser of May 19).
During the past six months the activity of both Russia and Japan in
Manchuria to gain economic and military supremacy has been increased
a hundred fold. No effort has been spared on the part of either nation
to forge ahead the outposts of their separate civilizations, and it would
seem that in the very near future a crisis must occur which will have an
effect upon the whole of Northern Asia.
After making an extensive trip lasting more than two months and taking
in nearly all of both Southern and Northern Manchuria, I firmly believe
that the stage is set for one of the greatest economic battles of modern
history. Whether or not it will assume proportions of open conflict, time
alone can tell. Both the Soviet and Japan are making preparations for
development in Manchuria on a much greater scale than ever before at-
tempted, but both are reckoning without their host, namely, China.
The Soviet has sworn "blood allegiance" to China and is doing every-
thing in her power to further the abrogation of the so-called "unequal
treaties"--if we are to believe the statements of Comrade Karakham,
first Soviet Ambassador to China in Peking. While the Soviet is meta-
phorically patting China on the back with one hand, she is calmly pursuing
an imperialistic policy of land-grabbing and concession-hunting with the
other which would have put the Tsarists to shame. The Soviet encroach-
ments in Manchuria during the past half year are greater than at any time
since the period immediately preceding the Russo-Japanese War.
NINE-POWER TREATY RATIFIED.-Early in July France ratified the two
Nine-Power Treaties relating to China which were negotiated in 1922 at
the Washington Conference. Since all other powers concerned (United


  p. 1804 (#736)                      #

1804
[Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
States, Great Britain, Italy, Japan, The Netherlands, Portugal, Belgium,
and China) had previously ratified, arrangements were made at Washington
for final exchange of ratifications on August 5, and for the calling of an
international conference, as provided in the treaties, to consider abrogation
of an extraterritoriality (consular courts), setting up of mixed courts, with-
drawal of foreign troops from China, and retrocession of leaseholds.
The Nine-Power Treaties include the so-called Root resolution binding the
powers to respect the sovereignty, independence, and administrative in-
tegrity of China, and to maintain the principle of equality of opportunity
for all nations in commerce and industry.
PROPOSALS TO China.—(From Baltimorė Sun, July 22).
Washington, July 22 (AP).-Definite proposals for settlement of pending
questions growing out of the recent anti-foreign outbreak in China are ex-
pected to be transmitted to the Chinese Provisional government by the
Peking diplomats in the near future.
While details are lacking, it now seems certain that the settlement
formula to be presented by the Peking diplomats will embrace two distinct
elements. They are :
Convocation of the Chinese customs revision conference with a minimum
of delay and creation of a commission to inquire into extra-territorial mat-
ters at a date still to be fixed.
Reference of the question of responsibility for bloodshed in the recent
Shanghai riots to a judicial inquiry, with the Chinese Government participat-
ing, and all governments bound to abide by the findings.
Formal expressions from Japan of her desire to carry out strictly the
commitments entered into with respect to China at the Washington Con-
ference is expected to pave the way for the first step. Similar expressions
from other governments are confidently expected as the result of the note
proposing this course sent out by Secretary Kellogg.
China and Russia.--(From Time, July 20).
Unbiased reports from China—that is, the average of biased reports, for
all communications from that once celestial land are more or less colored-
seem unanimous that the root of the disturbances is due to the foreign
powers which exploit China economically and dominate her politically.
Bolshevik influences, which are obviously existent, found rather than caused
a situation of deep discontent, which was naturally receptive of Moscow's
virulent propaganda.
But, if Bolshevism is not at the bottom of the Chinese anti-foreign move-
ment, it is a menace capable of endless trouble in China which can be offset
only by the unified action of the powers. The greatest danger is that the
Chinese Government, being met with nothing from the powers (mainly
Britain) but chilly demands for justice with idemnities for the Shanghai
outrages, will listen readily to the friendly advances of Moscow. Un-
doubtedly with this in their minds, the United States, Britain, and Japan
agreed to a compromise at Tokyo aimed at calming China, while at Swamp-
scott President Coolidge insisted on a scrupulous observance of the Nine-
Power Treaties, and respect for foreign lives and property by China and
virtually called an international conference for the fall.
The signs in Peking were that the Chinese Government would do its
best-and what that is remains to be seen-to restore quiet. How far the
nationalistic students will support the central government is another specula-


  p. 1805 (#737)                      #

1925]
1805
Notes on International Affairs
tion which appears equally impossible to hazard. Said the New York Times:
“When do Chinese students study?"
AMERICANS KILLED AND CAPTURED.—(From New York Times, July 24).
Peking, July 23 (AP).-Morgan Palmer, an American, has been killed by
bandits at his ranch on the Sungari River, near Harbin, Manchuria. Dr.
Harvey J. Howard, an eye specialist attached to the Rockefeller Hospital
in Peking, was captured at the same time.
Consular advices from Kalgan state that Mr. Palmer was killed on
July 20 while defending his property against the bandits.
Mr. Palmer and his mother, Dr. Howard and his son James, and an
American trader named Harold Baldwin of Kalgan, Chihli Province, to-
gether with his wife and child, were visiting Mr. Palmer's ranch, which
is in the Province of Kirin, when the attack was made.
The consular advices say that Dr. Hoard was still in captivity last
night, while the others were “safe for the present," but their whereabouts
was not known.
Mr. Palmer was connected with the Salt Administration in Peking, but
retired some time ago to conduct an experimental farm.


  p. 1806 (#738)                      #

BOOK REVIEWS
COMBATS ET BATAILLES SUR MER (September-Decem-
ber, 1914)—Claude Farrère et Paul Chack, Paris. E. Flam-
marion, Editeur, Paris. 7 fr. 95. p. 279.
REVIEWED BY REAR ADMIRAL ALBERT GLEAVES, U. S. N. (Red.)
The authors of these stories of sea fights during the World War are
naval officers of distinction. They are commanders on the active list, and
were classmates at the Naval School at Brest. Farrère is a well known
novelist and playwright, and in the service is generally regarded as a second
Pierre Loti. Commander Chack is chief of the historical section of the
Admiralty, and is the author of the Guerre de Croiseurs, a monumental
work which for originality in design, and wealth of detail is probably su-
perior to any other history of the operations which it describes. The
writers have blended their individual styles so admirably that it is not
possible to discern the dividing line; we presume, however, that Farrère
paints the background of sea and earth and sky, against which Chack
projects, with characteristic clearness and unusual freedom from technical
phraseology, a few chapters from the Odyssey of Count von Spee's ill-
fated squadron. The student, and also those who read for amusement, will
be interested in the pictures of the tropics, notably of Tahiti; that wonder
of the ocean bed, the submarine forests of coral at the Abrolhas Islands,
(“lookout for breakers") which are visible at a depth of twenty fathoms
when the sea is calm, and the sun high, and of the storm encountered by
the Germans on the voyage around the Horn.
The stories are made up largely from the personal narratives of the
survivors, and contain much material which, so far as we know, has not
hitherto been published. The human element of the book constitutes its
principal charm.
The operations selected by the authors are the bombardment of Papéété,
the "Death" of the Emden, the “Cavalry and Passion" of Admiral Cradock,
and the battle of the Falkland Islands.
The volume begins with a brief statement of the war situation as it was
on September 22, 1914, when "more than 850,000,000 of human beings, that
is to say, more than one half of the inhabitants of the globe, were more or
less engaged in the gigantic struggle, with eyes anxiously fixed on the
trenches, and ears listening to the fabulous tumult of armed forces. No
one, or almost no one, thought of the sea, and yet it was by the sea that
the contest was to be decided. To keep the sea lanes open for reinforcing
and supplying the troops at the front was the task for four years of the
allied navies.”


  p. 1807 (#739)                      #

1925]
1807
Book Reviews
Fifteen days before war was declared Admiral von Spee with his
squadron sailed from Tsing-tau and disappeared into the “blue immensity”
of the Pacific Ocean. About the same time a number of big German col-
liers departed without clearing from various ports of China and Japan.
Notwithstanding all efforts by wireless and cable, no news could be obtained
of their whereabouts, and eighty cruisers failed to located them. Thus
the Germans became a fleet in being, a menace to commerce and convoy,
holding the supreme strategic advantage of choice of time and position.
With a fatal disregard of this, the German admiral revealed his secret
to the world by appearing off Apia on September 14 with the Scharnhorst
and Gneisenau in the vain hope of surprising some British cruiser. Disap-
pointed in this, he continued on toward his rendezvous at Easter Island, but
stopped at Bora-Bora in the Society Islands to coal from the colliers he
had with him. Flying no colors, and covering the names of the ships with
tarpaulins, they were taken for English ships by the people on shore.
Cap ribbons were removed, and no officers were allowed on deck who
could not speak either French or English. When, therefore, the French
representative, a brigadier of gendarmes, came on board, he was completely
fooled and freely answered all questions. From him the admiral learned that
the defenses at Tahiti were insignificant and had not been strengthened,
and there was no ship there except a small gunboat and a German collier
containing 3,000 tons of coal, which she had recently captured. In the
afternoon von Spee sailed, and as he passed out of the harbor a large
French flag was hoisted ashore. He replied by displaying his own national
colors!
The next morning at day break, the German ships appeared off Tahiti
out of a dense fog. The captain of the Zelee, the French gunboat, had
assumed charge of the defense of the island. His name was Destremau
and he was a lieutenant de vaisseau, and is highly commended by the
authors as an exceptionally fine officer. Von Spee probably would not
have fired on the town had not the little French battery opened on him.
The result of the affair was that the Germans sank the gunboat and collier
by gun fire and fired a number of shells into the village of Papéété, which
caught fire and "burned like a torch." As the French had already set
fire to their own coal pile and destroyed the leading marks of the channel,
the object of the visit to replenish his colliers was frustrated, and von Spee
proceeded to the Marquesas, anchoring for a few hours in the beautiful
harbor of Nuka-Hiva where Commodore “Essex" Porter had refitted his
ships just 100 years before, prior to his battle in Valparaiso Harbor. ..
The authors consider the "combat de Tahiti” as lost by von Spee and won
by Lieutenant Destremau. Four years afterwards Destremau, then dead,
was awarded the posthumous honor of the rosette of the Legion of Honor
and the Croix de Guerre, on the recommendation of Admiral de Bon, the
chief of the naval general staff.
To Captain von Müller, of the Emden, the authors give unstinted praise.
Their opinion is that he lived up to the high traditions of the sea, and they
compare him with Sorcouf and Pierre de Bouvet.


  p. 1808 (#740)                      #

1808
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
On August 12 the Emden, which had sailed from Tsing-tau on August 3,
joined von Spee at Pagen Island. At the request of von Müller he was de-
tached and ordered on special duty. From that time until the loss of the
Emden at Cocos Island, on November 9, his career was one of destruction
and terror to merchant shipping, but without stain or blemish; as the
authors say, "he was a gentleman.” In this brief notice we are only con-
cerned with the Emden's action with the destroyer Mousquet immediately
following von Müller's brilliant exploit at Penang.
The Mousquet, under the command of Lieutenant Théroinne, was re-
turning from a night patrol off Penang ; her ammunition was stored away,
torpedo tubes trained fore and aft, awnings spread and the ship tidied
up for the day. At 6:20, when about fourteen miles north of Penang, she
sighted the Emden through the mist, and taking her for an ally hoisted the
recognition signal of the day, which was returned by a salvo of five 10 c.m.
shell, followed at minute intervals by five others. The Emden hoisted
her own colors and closed in but kept out of torpedo range. The action
lasted sixteen minutes (Corbett says seven). The Mousquet was literally
shot to pieces and went slowly down, bow first, her colors flying at the
gaff, her stern high in air, “as if drawn to heaven by the three-colored flag
of France."
The Germans picked up the survivors, many of whom were wounded,
but the captain, two officers and forty men disappeared with the ship.
The French fought to the last against overwhelming odds with that
courage, which, to use Macaulay's fine phrase, has so often claimed the
admiration of history. In that early morning fight Théroinne and his men
gave the French Navy another glorious tradition, and proved themselves
worthy successors of the great Suffren. Officers and crew were cited
for bravery, eight received special mention, and the name of Ensign Carri-
son was given to an ex-German submarine.
After the battle of Coronel von Spee with the Scharnhorst and Gneisenau
put into Valparaiso on November 3, 1914.
At once the ships were surrounded by a multitude of small boats filled
with an excited howling mob of Germans, screaming "Hochs," and calling
for the admiral to show himself.
But the count did not appear. He was closeted in his cabin with his
chief of staff, preparing his own report of the battle and scanning the
despatches just received. Save for bits of news, more or less unreliable,
which have drifted through Reuters and Havas he had been without in-
formation for many weeks.
When the German Minister came on board he at once began a flowery
speech of welcome, hailing von Spee as the Master of the Sea. The latter,
grave and dignified, interrupted and took him to his cabin with Captain
Fielitz, and the three remained there for two hours. When the conference
was over it was noticed that the admiral seemed even more serious, and
the gaiety of the minister had entirely vanished. In the meantime German
bands were making the harbor ring with Deutchland über Alles, Heil dir
im Seigerskrans and the Wacht am Rhein.


  p. 1809 (#741)                      #

1925)
1809
Book Reviews
The admiral declined all invitations ashore except the banquet in the
evening at the German club given by the German colony. This was an
obligatory sacrifice which he could not escape. The authors say, “The Ad-
miral dined at the club, drank champagne, and drained the chalice to the
dregs.” It was all in the day's work, a part of his trade.
To an old friend on the legation staff who said au revoir to him, he
replied Not au revoir, but adieu, and to another who presented him with
flowers, "I will keep these to the end ; they will still be fresh at our
funerals.”
It was not until after Coronel that the German Admiralty seemed to
see the writing on the wall, and, in despatches received at Valparaiso, it
suggested to von Spee that he return to Germany with his ships, but that
he keep them together. The authors criticize this as lacking in dash and
determination, and express the opinion that the admiral should have been
directed to scatter his force, the ships to make the best of their way in-
dependently, avoiding action, coaling from their own colliers or from prizes.
At the end of the allowed twenty-four hours von Spee put to sea and
returned to Mas-a-fuera. He realized the increasing seriousness of his
position and that it was daily more difficult to obtain shelter in Chilian
harbors or opportunities to coal. All the news received at Valparaiso con-
vinced him that the famous German organization was crumbling. He must
have passed many gloomy hours in his cabin alone with his thoughts. It
has been said that just as mercury shows the coming of bad weather and will
shrink within its glass artery, so there may be some subtle property in the
blood which perceives the hands that are raised to waste and spill it. If
this be true the German admiral's blood must have warned him of his fate.
From all accounts of his last days from those who saw him in Chile and the
few survivors from the fleet who are qualified to speak, Count von Spee
was a changed man after his victory over Cradock. He was obsessed with
the idea of English revenge. Had he pushed on with his former energy
after leaving Valparaiso, either to the Falklands or to the coast of Argen-
tine, history would have been written differently, but he spent a week coaling
at Mas-a-fuera, and again five days in St. Quentin Bay, 300 miles north
of the Straits of Magellan. It seemed, as the authors say, that he could
not make up his mind to leave those calm waters, or the hospitable shores
of the Gulf of Peñas “trembling with the call of the southern springtime.”
The voyage to Cape Horn was made in such heavy weather that speed was
reduced to little more than steerage way, and the ships loaded to the gunwales
with coal labored so heavily that the seas broke over them as upon rocks
at half tide. The wind blew a hurricane from the southwest and over-
head black clouds drove like a funeral pall over the doomed ships. Ac-
cording to the authors they were frequently on their beam ends, rolling
their keels out of water.
On December 2 the squadron was off the Horn and the weather began to
abate. At this time the Leipzig sighted an English sailing vessel which
proved to be a collier. For von Spee it was an unfortunate prize. She


  p. 1810 (#742)                      #

1810
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
was towed to Picton Island at the entrance of Beagle Channel, and the next
day the ships coaled again. The three days delay at Picton Island sealed
their death warrant.
Before sailing on December 6, the captains were called on board the
flagship, and, to their astonishment, were informed by von Spee that he
proposed to attack Port Stanley. The chief of staff and the captain of the
Nürnberg were the only ones who concurred; the others were silent, ex-
cept the captain of the Leipzig, who firmly dissented, but the admiral
had at last made up his mind. He ended the conference by saying, “Gentle-
men, I have spoken. Day after tomorrow at 8:00 A.M. we shall attack Port
Stanley." It was a dramatic scene and reminds one of Beauregard's coun-
cil of war the night before the second day's battle of Shiloh: "Gentlemen.
tomorrow night we shall sleep in the camps of the enemy," and the dreams of
the admiral were as futile as those of the general.
The authors' account of how the news of Coronel was received at the
Admiralty, of Sir John Fisher's calmness but prompt action is as graphic
as Sir Quiller-Couch's description of Lord Barham's reception of the mes-
senger from Trafalgar. When Admiral Oliver, the chief of staff, showed
the telegram to Fisher, without a word the latter turned to the chart on
which the positions of the allied and enemy's ships were plotted with colored
pins, picked out those of the Good Hope and the Monmouth and dropped
them on the floor. After a few minutes thought he measured the distance
between Valparaiso and Falkland and from the English Channel to Falk-
land, then said “Call Sturdee.” Admiral Sturdee left London on an hour's
notice for Devonport and on November il sailed for the South Atlantic
with the Invincible and the Inflexible. He arrived at the Abrozhos Islands
on November 26, where he found the squadron of Rear Admiral Stoddert
consisting of six ships. From Admiral Stoddert, Sturdee heard that the
Germans were expected to arrive off the Plate about December 15.
Fisher had said that von Spee would go to the Falklands, and Sturdee
refused to be diverted by unreliable telegrams and conflicting reports that
the Germans were on the west coast of South America bound for Panama ;
at any rate that contingency had been provided for by the Titan in London,
who had sent the Princess Royal to the West Indies. On November 28,
two days after the Germans started for the Falklands, Sturdee sailed from
the Abrolhos rendezvous. He arrived at Port Stanley at 11:00 A.m. on
December 7 and at once began coaling and overhauling engines.
History, perhaps, does not record a greater surprise or one fraught with
more momentous consequences, than that of the navigator of the Gneisenau
when he sighted the tripodmasts of the British battle cruisers over the sand
dunes of the Falklands, at daybreak on December 8. Those masts spelled the
death warrant of Admiral von Spee's squadron. It is the opinion of the
authors that even at this hour von Spee had a chance, and that a Nelson
or a Suffren would have seized it and won. The English were at anchor,
coaling, overhauling engines, under low steam, and without a thought
that the Germans were east of Cape Horn. It was a situation that would


  p. 1811 (#743)                      #

1925)
1811
Book Reviews
have meant disaster to Sturdee had von Spee been a Farragut or a Dewey.
Lord Fisher once said that imagination and audacity beget surprise, and
according to the authors von Spee, whom they admit was a good fighter,
lacked the very qualities of imagination and audacity which make a great
leader; they admit that he was a valiant sailor, but no chart genius, and
did not know how to make war.
The story of December 8 has never been better told. "Sturdee held all
of the trumps, but Sir John Fisher had won the battle a month before-
what followed was the execution, not swift destruction by the guillotine,
but destruction by the slow process of the saw. The battle dragged nearly
three hours. The end, however, was the same, and von Spee's head fell into
the basket.”
During the battle a singular thing occurred. A sailing ship under full
canvas suddenly appeared between the opposing vessels. She saluted by
dipping her colors, which, unfortunately could not be made out. The salute,
of course, could not be returned, but Sturdee, with the meticulous courtesy
of the sea, ran off his course to clear her, and the Invincible, none the less
gallant, opened out from the Inflexible, in order that the ricochets from the
Germans might go clear of "the frail hull and her snowy sails bathed in the
sunshine.”
"Even as the French guns on the Marne sounded the knell of the German
Armies, so the British guns off the Falklands sounded the knell of the Ger-
man Navy. The guns of Falkland were heard in London, and Fisher
recognized them—he had waited for them. They were heard in Berlin and
their burning breath scorched the Kaiser and von Tirpitz, for they dedicated
the German squadrons to defeat.”
So ends the book. It is to be hoped that the authors will find as com-
petent and sympathetic a translator as the author of that other classic,
Ariel.
COMBATS ET BATAILLES SUR MER (September-Decem-
ber, 1914)—By Claude Farrère and Paul Chack. E. Flam-
marion, Editor. Paris. 7 fr. 95. Five articles : Tahiti, Penang,
La Mort de l'Emden, Coronel and Les Falkland.
These articles are far from being war stories such as we have known them
from the pen of the “Correspondent” or the "Eye Witness.” There are some
efforts at literary garnish, some speculative and descriptive digressions,
but the dominant tone is that of an appreciative expert noting faithfully
and progressively what is happening and the conditions under which it is
happening. Time and again, the authors refuse to maneuver for dramatic
effect, little inclined to make a thriller out of the subject matter ; on the
other hand, they are equally far from the grave historian. Generalization
is avoided, detail is the order of the day, and episodes have their place.
Furthermore, the style is conversational, informal, at times familiar and
even rubbing elbows with jargon. However, the details are invariably


  p. 1812 (#744)                      #

1812
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
significant and the episodes luminous and interesting. If the style flies
below the literary levels, it makes up by being remarkably clear, concise,
flexible, and, shall we say, self-effacing ? Objects, events, states of mind are
rapidly noted, significance and relation neatly underscored. The reader
is hardly aware of reading; he has the feeling of reality, of selected,
significant reality.
Tahiti.—The book should not be judged by the first article. Notwith-
standing many excellent pages on the general situation contained in Tahiti,
this article suffers severely from heterogeneous elements, aims and efforts,
and is considerably marred by gusts of a controversial nature. It also
fails to carry persuasion in the main theme. To be sure, Lieutenant
Destremau performs his duty in admirable fashion, but the lay reader is
not persuaded that three volleys from 65-mm. guns frightened von Spee
into renouncing his plan of taking Tahiti. In fact, the reader is not
informed why von Spee, whose escarde fantôme is causing so much anxiety
by the mystery of its whereabouts, should abandon his design on Cradock's
squadron and announce himself “at home at Papéété." All that the reader
sees is that von Spee carefully surveys the situation, takes the most favor-
able position, opens fire and reduced Papéété to ashes.
Penang.-Penang is perhaps the best of the five articles. The historical
event is simple: The Russian cruiser Yemchoug moors in the harbor of
Penang. Toward daybreak, the Emden passes by, fires one torpedo going ;
another, coming; the Yemchoug is no more; the Emden sinks a French
torpedo boat and leaves for an unknown destination.
How did it happen? or, did it actually happen? Was it a nightmare?
a mirage? Such seems to have been the atmosphere, and the authors excel
in reproducing that atmosphere in the making.
La Mort de l'Emden is more exhilarating reading. It covers the career
of the Einden after Penang, including her fight for life, as well as the
Odyssey of von Mücke, beginning on a sail boat at Cocos Islands and ending
at Constantinople, where he rejoins the German forces after eighty-four days
of peril and adventure. There is not an incident that could be spared
without loss; not a word that would not be missed; no delay in the progress
of the narrative unless it be to give the reader his bearings, to listen to the
wireless or to note that it is not heard. It is a stern but appreciative account
of will, courage, and resourcefulness.
Coronel and Les Falkland.-In both Coronel and Les Falkland much
space is devoted to preliminaries, to states of mind, to Cradock's vain
appeals for reinforcement and his stoic attitude after repeated refusals,
von Spee's heavy hearted celebration of the victory, a glance at Fisher, at
the War Office, at Sturdee's speedy departure for Port Stanley
The main action in each battle is fully noted. But, however important,
however long drawn, however touching and admirable in their stoic heroism,
they furnish less opportunity to the writers than the situation that follows
each main section, at dusk, in the dark: the suspense, anxiety, the nervous-
ness when friend and foe rub noses without recognizing each other. It is


  p. 1813 (#745)                      #

1925)
1813
Book Reviews
this phase of the fighting that also presents what is perhaps the outstanding
episode: the last gasps of the Monmouth.
Helplessly crippled, unable to move, with a list that makes her guns
point to the water on one side and to the clouds on the other, the Monmouth
is challenged in the dark by the Nürnberg. No reply. The enemy opens a
violent fire; he ceases, he renews. The sole reply is that of the last
projector casting its light on the flag Aoating from the after mast. Gradually
the Monmouth is gliding into the water, and the flag is foating and the
projector is shedding its light until it is extinguished by the water.
From the beginning to the end, through the irony sprinkled in Tahiti,
the sluggish atmosphere of Penang, the brisk career of the Emden, the
Odyssey of von Mücke and the tragedies of the South American waters,
the authors are sparing in, almost refraining from, terms expressing emotion.
It is by skilful selection and careful notation that they attain the desired
end.
It is realism with a vengeance.
H. B.
!
ALL THE WORLD'S AIRCRAFT. Founded by Fred T.
Jane, Edited and Compiled by C. G. Grey. Sampson Low, and
Marston, Ltd., 1923. D. Van Nostrand Co., New York.
$12.50
To those familiar with Jane's Fighting Ships little introduction is needed
to Jane's All the World's Aircraft. The two volumes, aside from being
similar in construction and binding, are also similar in general arrange-
ment.
All the World's Aircraft has been published yearly since 1911. The book
contains nearly 400 pages and consists of four parts as follows:
Part A-World's Aeronautical Progress.
......... 78 pages
Part B—All the World's Airplanes (Including Sections on
Helicopters and Glides)......
........ 230 pages
Part C—All the World's Aero-Engines..................... 53 pages
Part D-All the World's Airships.
.. 8 pages
Each of these four parts contains a separate section for every country
having standing in the aeronautical world. Photographs and sketches are
numerous.
The yearly editions follow closely the world's aeronautical progress.
During 1923 there was great activity in development of the aircraft engine.
Nearly every nation has begun to re-arm its air services with faster and
more powerful airplanes. These new types appear in the 1924 edition.
Several countries are producing new types of civilian airplanes for both
passenger and freight service. Among some of the most interesting machines
described appear a number of types designed and built in countries which


  p. 1814 (#746)                      #

1814
(Sept.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
have not hitherto appeared as aircraft producers, having previously bought
all of their machines abroad.
One of the most striking features of airplane design during 1923 was
the introduction of light airplanes, commonly miscalled “motor gliders”
(because they were developed as a result of the glider competitions of 1922).
These are described and illustrated.
The air lines of the world are described at length. Such progress as has
been made in airship design is given attention. Gliders, though nearly
extinct, receive consideration. Several types of helicopters are described,
and even naval aircraft carriers are treated briefly.
A historical section deals fully with the latest developments of the air
services of all nations and gives details of the organization and establishment
of each nation's air force. For the first time considerable information is
given concerning aviation in the Union of Soviet Republics, generally called
Russia.
Captain W. H. Sayers, late R.A.F., and now technical editor of The
Aeroplane, deals comprehensively, in special articles, with the general trend
of aircraft and engine design, and indicates recent progress in comparison
with previous years.
Containing a variety of information generously illustrated, All the
World's Aircraft is a most valuable book for study and reference to every-
one interested in aeronautics.
W. W W.


  p. 1815 (#747)                      #

SECRETARY'S NOTES
Membership New members joining since last report:
Davis, Kenneth S., Ensign, U.S.C.G. Davis, R. G., Lieut. Comdr., U.S.N.
Raynor, Leroy P., Lieut., Č. & G. Survey Kelly, R. K., Lieut., U.S.N.
Bell, A. Colquhoun, Lieut. Comdr., R.B.N. Borden, M. E., Lieut., U.S.N.R.F.
Johnson, H. W., Lieut., U.S.N.
Wellings, Augustus J., Lieut., U.S.N.
Special Information
Number
The October, 1925, PROCEEDINGS will be
known as the “Special Information Num-
ber," commemorative of Navy Day.
The Institute desires articles of interest to all branches
Articles of the service, including the reserve force. Non-
members as well as members may submit articles, and
authors receive due compensation for articles published. Com-
pact, well digested articles are more likely to be accepted for
early publication. In accepting articles for publication, the In-
stitute reserves the right to have such articles revised or rearranged,
where necessary, in order to bring them up to the required stand-
ard of articles published in the PROCEEDINGS—the cost, if any, to
be deducted from the compensation due the author.
Contributors are requested to observe the following special in-
structions in preparing articles for the PROCEEDINGS:
(a) In writing names of ships put only the initial letters in
capitals and underscore the names. The underscoring sig.
nifies to the printer that the word is to be in italics. The
same applies to names of publications. Foreign words not
anglicized should also be italicized.
(b) In preparing tables and computations employing fractions,
sub-numbers, etc., do by hand that part which cannot be
made perfectly clear by the typewriter.
(c) In typing the script use double space between lines.
(d) When a quotation is included in an article the editor should
be assured by appropriate notation that the writer has care-
fully verified the quotation as presented.


  p. 1816 (#748)                      #

1816
(Sept.
:
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Perry's
Referring to page 1475 of the August PROCEED-
Ings in the article "Perry's Victory on Lake
Original Flag
Erie,” the original flag of Perry, bearing Law-
rence's motto, “Don't Give up the Ship,” is now at the Naval
Academy, and so displayed in Memorial Hall that it is the first
object to greet the eye of any midshipman or visitor.
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions INGS is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.
The Institute desires to obtain a copy of Jane's
Jane's
"Fighting Ships”
Fighting Ships, 1924, the edition of which
is exhausted; and requests that anyone wish-
(1924)
ing to dispose of a copy communicate with
the Naval Institute, stating price desired and condition of book.
Storage Battery
Manual
The price of Dunn's Storage Battery Manual
has been reduced from $7.00 to $2.00 per copy.
New
Naval Ordnance, 1921 is now under revision. The
new book will be ready for issue about the 15th of
Books
November, and will be known as Naval Ordnance,
1925. It will retail at $8.00 per copy, postpaid.
There has just been received from the printer a new book,
Radio Manual, prepared by the Department of E. E. and P., U. S.
Naval Academy, for use as a textbook by midshipmen of the first
class. The book was designed to meet the special requirements
of the midshipmen, and treats not only with the receiving, but
also with the sending of messages. Price $3.00, postpaid.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
; Captain, U. S. Navy, Secretary-Treasurer.


  p. 1816 (#749)                      #

United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
VOL. 51
OCTOBER, 1925
NO. 272


LIN
KSTI
00
NAV
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S.
TUT
E
IDENS
1873
SCIENTIA)
CONTENTS
1817
1825
1832
1838
Gentlemen, The Navy.-Robinson . .
Navy Day. Howe
The Elements of Sea Power and the Future of the Navy.-Eberle
Petroleum and National Defense.—Jones.
Military Preparedness Necessary to the Economic and Social Welfare of the
United States.-Rodgers
The United States Marine Corps. -Lejeune.
Some Aviation Fundamentals.- Moffett.
The Wise Man Knows His Tools.-Robison,
The Development and Growth of the American Na
ans
The Array Against Sovereignty. Cluverius
The Naval Research Laboratory. -Foley
Unified Procurement of Government Aircraft.-Wilson
New Lease of Life for Old Ironsides.-Krafft
The Government-Owned Merchant Marine. — Palmer
Comparative Naval Data for the Treaty Navies
Discussion . . . .
Professional Notes .
Notes on International Affairs
Book Reviews
Secretary's Notes
..
1845
1858
1871
1882
1897
1916
1925
1933
1938
1944
1954
1961
1967
2036
2045
2047
....
.
..


  p. 1816 (#750)                      #

1816
(Sept.
:
U.S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Referring to page 1475 of the August PROCEED-
Perry's
Original Flag
Ings in the article “Perry's Victory on Lake
& Erie," the original flag of Perry, bearing Law-
rence's motto, “Don't Give up the Ship,” is now at the Naval
Academy, and so displayed in Memorial Hall that it is the first
object to greet the eye of any midshipman or visitor.
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions INGS is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.
The Institute desires to obtain a copy of Jane's
Jane's
“Fighting Ships"
Fighting Ships, 1924, the edition of which
is exhausted; and requests that anyone wish-
(1924)
ing to dispose of a copy communicate with
the Naval Institute, stating price desired and condition of book.
Storage Battery The price of Dunn's Storage Battery Manual
Manual
has been reduced from $7.00 to $2.00 per copy.
Naval Ordnance, 1921 is now under revision. The
New
new book will be ready for issue about the 15th of
Books
November, and will be known as Naval Ordnance,
1925. It will retail at $8.00 per copy, postpaid.
There has just been received from the printer a new
Radio Manual, prepared by the Depart of E. E. and
Naval Academy, for use as a textbra hidshipm
class. The book was designed
of the midshipmen, and treat
also with the sending of m


  p. 1816 (#751)                      #


United States
Naval Institute
Proceedings
VOL. 51
OCTOBER, 1925
NO. 272
NST
VAL
NAV
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S.
TUTA
D
* 18
SCIENTIA
13
CONTENTS
n, T
-Robinson
jet
1817
1825
1832
1838
Power and the Future of the Navy.-Eberle
1 Defense. -Tones . .
Necessary Economic and Social Welfare of the
Rodgers
arine Co
mentals.
18 His
Growt
can Navy.-Evans
Sovereig
Labor
of Go
lft.-Wilson
afft.
2.- Palmer
Data
Navies
for Old
wned
1845
1858
1871
1882
1897
1916
1925
1933
1938
1944
1954
1961
1967
2036
2045
2047
tional


  p. 1816 (#752)                      #


FUEL OIL
GAS OIL
DIESEL OIL
There is more power in
THAT GOOD GULF GASOLINE
and
SUPREME AUTO OIL
GULF REFINING COMPANY
New York
Boston
New Orleans
Philadelphia
Atlanta
Houston
General Sales Office
PITTSBURGH, PA.